<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89222-0102 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.2-22-89.f2.A1101</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4703"/><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">Biweekly Notice Applications and Amendments to Operating LicensesInvolving No Significant Hazards Considerations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>Pursuant to Public Law (P.L.) 97-415, the Nuclear Regulatory Commission(the Commission) is publishing this regular biweekly notice. P.L. 97-415revised section 189 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act),to require the Commission to publish notice of any amendments issued, orproposed to be issued, under a new provision of section 189 of the Act.This provision grants the Commission the authority to issue and make immediatelyeffective any amendment to an operating license upon a determination bythe Commission that such amendment involves no significant hazards consideration,notwithstanding the pendency before the Commission of a request for a hearingfrom any person. This biweekly notice includes all notices of amendments issued, or proposedto be issued from January 30, 1989 through February 9, 1989. The last biweeklynotice was published on February 8, 1989 (54 FR 6185). <ITAG tagnum="84">NOTICE OF CONSIDERATION OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATINGLICENSE AND PROPOSED NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATION DETERMINATIONAND OPPORTUNITY FOR HEARING </ITAG>The Commission has made a proposed determination that the following amendmentrequests involve no significant hazards consideration. Under the Commission'sregulations in 10 CFR 50.92, this means that operation of the facilityin accordance with the proposed amendments would not (1) involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated;or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. The basis for this proposed determination for eachamendment request is shown below. The Commission is seeking public comments on this proposed determination.Any comments received within 30 days after the date of publication of thisnotice will be considered in making any final determination. The Commissionwill not normally make a final determination unless it receives a requestfor a hearing. Written comments may be submitted by mail to the Regulatory PublicationsBranch, Division of Freedom of Information and Publications Services, Officeof Administration and Resources Management, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, and should cite the publication date and page numberof this <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. Written comments may also be deliveredto Room P-216, Phillips Building, 7920 Norfolk Avenue, Bethesda, Marylandfrom 7:30 a.m. to 4:15 p.m. Copies of written comments received may beexamined at the NRC Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street,NW., Washington, DC. The filing of requests for hearing and petitions forleave to intervene is discussed below. By March 24, 1989, the licensee may file a request for a hearing with respectto issuance of the amendment to the subject facility operating licenseand any person whose interest may be affected by this proceeding and whowishes to participate as a party in the proceeding must file a writtenpetition for leave to intervene. Requests for a hearing and petitions forleave to intervene shall be filed in accordance with the Commission's ``Rulesof Practice for Domestic Licensing Proceedings'' in 10 CFR Part 2. If arequest for a hearing or petition for leave to intervene is filed by theabove date, the Commission or an Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, designatedby the Commission or by the Chairman of the Atomic Safety and LicensingBoard Panel, will rule on the request and/or petition and the Secretaryor the designated Atomic Safety and Licensing Board will issue a noticeof hearing or an appropriate order. As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall setforth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceeding,and how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding.The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention shouldbe permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) thenature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to theproceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial,or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of anyorder which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest.The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subjectmatter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Anyperson who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has beenadmitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave ofthe Board up to fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfythe specificity requirements described above. Not later than fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to thepetition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions whichare sought to be litigated in the matter, and the bases for each contentionset forth with reasonable specificity. Contentions shall be limited tomatters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. A petitionerwho fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirementswith respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participateas a party. Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subjectto any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have theopportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, includingthe opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. If a hearing is requested, the Commission will make a final determinationon the issue of no significant hazards consideration. The final determinationwill serve to decide when the hearing is held. If the final determination is that the amendment request involves no significanthazards consideration, the Commission may issue the amendment and makeit immediately effective, notwithstanding the request for a hearing. Anyhearing held would take place after issuance of the amendment. If the final determination is that the amendment involves a significanthazards consideration, any hearing held would take place before the issuanceof any amendment. Normally, the Commission will not issue the amendment until the expirationof the 30-day notice period. However, should circumstances change duringthe notice period such that failure to act in a timely way would result,for example, in derating or shutdown of the facility, the Commission mayissue the license amendment before the expiration of the 30-day noticeperiod, provided that its final determination is that the amendment involvesno significant hazards consideration. The final determination will considerall public and State comments received before action is taken. Should theCommission take this action, it will publish a notice of issuance and providefor opportunity for a hearing after issuance. The Commission expects thatthe need to take this action will occur very infrequently. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filedwith the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Service Branch, or may bedelivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building,2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC, by the above date. Where petitionsare filed during the last ten (10) days of the notice period, it is requestedthat the petitioner promptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephonecall to Western Union at 1-(800) 325-6000 (in Missouri 1-(800) 342-6700).The Western Union operator should be given Datagram Identification Number3737 and the following message addressed to (<T3>Project Director</T3>): petitioner's name and telephone number; datepetition was mailed; plant name; and publication date and page number ofthis <T4>Federal Regester </T4>notice. A copy of the petition should also besent to the Office of the General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee. Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions,supplemental petitions and/or requests for hearing will not be entertainedabsent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or thepresiding Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, that the petition and/or requestshould be granted based upon a balancing of factors specified in 10 CFR2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v) and 2.714(d). For further details with respect to this action, see the application foramendment which is available for public inspection at the Commission'sPublic Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington,DC, and at the local public document room for the particular facility involved.<ITAG tagnum="84">Arizona Public Service Company, et al., Docket No. STN 50-530, PaloVerde Nuclear Generating Station (PVNGS), Unit 3, Maricopa County, Arizona</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 27, 1988. <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment consistsof a number of proposed changes to the Technical Specifications (AppendixA to Facility Operating License No. T1NPF-74) in support of Cycle 2 operationfor the plant. The specific proposed changes are discussed below: (1) Specification 3.1.1.2 - propose to change Figure 3.1-1A, ``ShutdownMargin Versus Cold Leg Temperature,'' by changing the Hot Zero Power endpointfrom 6.0 to 6.5% delta k/k to maintain plant operation during Cycle 2 withinthe bounds of the safety analyses. (2) Specification 3.1.1.3 - propose to change Figure 3.1-1, ``AllowableMTC Modes 1 and 2,'' by broadening the operating bounds of the ModeratorTemperature Coefficient (MTC) to accommodate Cycle 2 operation, and byrevising the x axis parameter from average moderator temperature to corepower level. The change to the Figure is proposed to ensure that the assumptionsused in accident and transient analyses remain valid through each fuelcycle. (3) Specification 3.2.8 - propose to change the operational pressure bandof the pressurizer from 1815 - 2370 psia to 2025 - 2300 psia to ensurethat the actual value of the pressurizer pressure is maintained withinthe range of values used in safety analyses. (4) Specifications 3.1.3.1, 3.1.3.2, 3.1.3.7, 3.10.2 and 3.10.4 - proposeto add a new specification (3.1.3.7) to specify insertion limits for partlength Control Element Assemblies (CEA), and to delete direct referencesto the control of part length CEAs from Specifications 3.1.3.1 and 3.1.3.2.The proposed change would add a more explicit limiting condition for operationof the part length CEAs to clarify the allowable duration for these CEAsto remain within the defined ranges of axial position. The proposed changesto Specifications 3.10.2 and 3.10.4 would reference the new Specification3.1.3.7 to continue to permit the required special test exceptions to partlength CEA insertion limits during certain reactor core tests. (5) Specification 3.3.1 - propose to change Table 3.3-2 in this specificationby decreasing the response time from 0.75 to 0.30 seconds, for the DNBR- LOW Reactor Coolant Pump Shaft Speed Trip. The proposed change wouldbe consistent with the faster response time assumed in the Cycle 2 safetyanalysis. (6) Specifications 3.1.3.5 and 3.1.3.6 - propose revisions to address theshutdown and regulating CEA insertion limits specifically for 1 or 2 ControlElement Assembly Calculators (CEACs) out of service. Additionally the insertionlimits for the full length CEAs in Figures 3.1-3 and 3.1-4 are to be mademore restrictive due to the proposed changes in Cycle 2 core physics. Therevised insertion limits are proposed to ensure that there is sufficientmargin to mitigate the effects of a dropped CEA or an ejected CEA. (7) Specification 3/4.3.1 - propose to change Table 3.3-2 by excludingan allowance to enter Core Protection Calculator (CPC) penalty factorsto compensate for Resistance Temperature Detector (RTD) response timesgreater than 8 seconds. Table 3.3-2a, which specifies the amounts of theallowable CPC penalty factors, would be deleted. The proposed change wouldbe required since the Cycle 2 safety analyses do not consider RTD responsetimes greater than 8 seconds and, therefore, allowances for longer responsetimes would not be permissible during Cycle 2 operation. (8) Specification 2.1.1.1 and Table 2.2-1 - propose to change the Departurefrom Nucleate Boiling Ratio (DNBR) limitation from 1.231 to 1.24, and deletereferences to the calculation of additional rod bow penalties into theDNBR limit. The proposed changes would be required to account for the corechanges in Cycle 2. (9) Specification 3.2.5 - propose to change the minimum Reactor CoolantSystem (RCS) total flow rate in Mode 1 from 164.0x106 to 155.8x106 lbm/hr.The proposed value of 155.8x106 lbm/hr is higher than the value used inthe safety analysis (i.e., is more conservative). The proposed change wouldeliminate ambiguity regarding compensation for instrument uncertainty.(10) Specification 3.2.1 - propose to change the Linear Heat Rate (LHR)limit for the fuel assemblies from 14.0 to 13.5 kw/ft and to delineatehow LHR is to be monitored. The change also revises the format to improvethe TS from a human factors point of view. The change is proposed to ensurethat the peak fuel clad temperature does not exceed safety limits duringCycle 2 operation. (11) Specifications 3.2.4 and 3.3.1 - propose to change Specification 3.2.4as follows: (a) provide a new format which would address the specific conditionsfor monitoring DNBR with or without the Core Operating Limit SupervisorySystem (COLSS) and/or the CEA Calculators (CEACs), (b) provide a new formatwhich would delineate the Actions that should be taken, (c) remove referenceto the DNBR Penalty Factor table used in Specification 4.2.4.4, and (d)replace the present graph Figures 3.2-1 and 3.2-2 for the DNBR limits withgraph Figures 3.2-1, 3.2-2 and 3.2-2a which would address the DNBR operatinglimits for the conditions mentioned in (a) above. Propose to change Specification3.3.1 by: (a) removing references to the operation of the reactor withboth CEACs inoperable with or without COLSS in service, and (b) deletingthe graph of DNBR margin operating limit based on COLSS for both CEAs inoperable(Figure 3.3-1) since these changes would be incorporated into the proposedchanges in Specification 3.2.4. The changes are proposed to ensure operationof Cycle 2 within safety analysis limits and to improve these Specificationsfrom a human factors point of view. (12) Specification 3.2.3 - propose to change the action value for the AzimuthalPower Tilt allowance, when reactor power level is above 20% and COLSS isin service from 0.10 to a range of values (i.e., 0.20 for a reactor powerlevel of 20-30%, 0.15 for a reactor power level of 30-40%, and 0.10 forpower levels above 40%). The proposed change would reduce the delay inpower resumption (in order to burn out xenon buildup) following a reactorpower cutback, while staying within the bounds of the safety analyses.(13) Specification 3.3.2 - propose to change Table 3.3-4 by removing the``greater than'' sign from the Refueling Actuation Signal (RAS) trip valuein order to ensure optimal protection of the Refueling Water Storage Tankpumps by maintaining adequate margin for the RAS trip value within theallowable values specified in Table 3.3-4. (14) Administrative Changes - propose to change the Bases Sections forSpecifications 3/4.3.1, 3/4.3.2 and 2.2.1 to ensure clarity and conciseness.The proposed changes to the Bases Sections for 3/4.3.1 and 3/4.3.2 wouldupdate, to the latest approved revision, the report used for controllingchanges to the CPC software, and remove Cycle 1 specific information. Theproposed changes to the Bases Section for 2.2.1 would refer to the appropriateCE reports to be used for calculating trip setpoint values. Another proposedchange to the Bases Section pages B2-5 and B2-6 would change the pressurizerpressure floor incorporated into the DNBR limit from 1861 to 1860 psia.This slight change would make this value the same as all other CE CPC plants.Another proposed change is to the Bases Section B2.2.1 on page B2-6. Thissection concerns the basis for the DNBR-low trip and lists the parameterranges of validity for the CPC DNBR algorithm. This section also statesthat operation outside these limits will result in a CPC trip. One of theparameters listed is the high limit for the integrated radial peaking factor.The proposed change would revise this range limit from 4.28 to 7.00 inorder to reduce the possibility of unnecessary plant trips during cycle2 operation. <T3>Basis for Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determination:</T3>The Commission has provided guidance for determining whether a proposedamendment involves a significant hazards consideration (51 FR 7751). Examplesof amendments that are not likely to involve a significant hazards considerationare as follows: (i) A purely administrative change to technical specifications: for example,a change to achieve consistency throughout the technical specifications,correction of an error or a change in nomenclature. (ii) A change that constitutes an additional limitation, restriction orcontrol not presently included in the technical specifications: for example,a more stringent surveillance requirement. (iii) For a nuclear power reactor, a change resulting from a nuclear reactorcore reloading, if no fuel assemblies significantly different from thosefound previously acceptable to the NRC for a previous core of the facilityin question are involved. This assumes that no significant changes aremade to the acceptance criteria for the technical specifications, thatthe analytical methods used to demonstrate conformance with the technicalspecifications and regulations are not significantly changed, and thatNRC has previously found such methods acceptable. The staff considers the first 12 items of the proposed amendment to besimilar to example (iii) since they are directly related to a reactor corereloading and the fuel assemblies are not significantly different thanthose previously found acceptable for reload cores at Palo Verde. In addition,no significant changes are being made to the previously approved acceptancecriteria for the technical specifications or to the analytical methodsused to demonstrate conformance with the specifications and regulations.Items (1) and (3) through (8) are also similar to example (ii) since theyinvolve more restrictive limitations in the technical specifications toensure that operation of the facility during Cycle 2 remains within thebounds of the safety analyses. Items (9), (10) and (11) are also similarto example (i) since they involve certain clarifications to the technicalspecification as well as a proposed new format for Specifications 3.2.4and 3.3.1. The staff considers Item (13) to be similar to example (ii) since it imposesa more stringent limitation to the RAS trip value. The staff considers Item (14) to be similar to example (i) since it involvesa clarification and administrative changes to the technical specifications.Accordingly, the Commission has proposed to determine that the above changesdo not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Phoenix Public Library, Businessand Science Division, 12 East McDowell Road, Phoenix, Arizona 85004 <T3>Attorney for licensees: </T3>Mr. Arthur C. Gehr, Snell andamp; Wilmer,3100 Valley Center, Phoenix, Arizona 85073. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>George W. Knighton <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-325 and50-324, Brunswick Steam Electric Plant, Units 1 and 2, Brunswick County,North Carolina</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>August 3, 1987 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The amendment would change theTechnical Specifications (TS) for the Brunswick Steam Electric Plant (BSEP)by specifying a staff-approved control rod sequence program. Currently,surveillance Requirement 4.1.4.2 requires verification that the controlrod sequence input to the rod worth minimizer computer is correct followingits loading into the computer. The proposed revision specifies that thissequence program be GE's generic banked position withdrawal sequence (BPWS)rod pattern program. The licensee normally implements this program, butdoes not take credit for its use in cycle specific reload topical reports.Specifying the use of BPWS rod patterns allows use of GE's generic controlrod drop analysis and eliminates the need for performing cycle specificanalyses. In addition, the word ``Operational'' will be added before theword ``Condition'' on page 3/4 1-14. This administrative change will addconsistency to the TS by addressing operational conditions of the plant.Basis for proposed no significant hazard consideration determination: TheCommission has provided standards for determining whether a no significanthazard consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license involves no significant hazards consideration ifoperation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment wouldnot: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The CarolinaPower andamp; Light Company (CPandamp;L) has reviewed the proposed changesto the TS and has determined that the requested amendment does not involvea significant hazards consideration for the following reasons: <ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.A generic, statistical analysis of the Control Rod Drop Analysis (CRDA)has been done by GE for the Banked Position Withdrawal Sequence (BPWS).This analysis verified that the resulting fuel enthalpies in the eventof a CRDA would be less than 280 calories per gram as required by the fuelrod enthalpy limits specified in FSAR Section 15.4.6.1. A Safety EvaluationReport was issued by the NRC on October 13, 1983, which approved the analysis.The proposed TS changes will enforce the use of BPWS rod patterns in theRod Worth Minimizer (RWM). Adherence to the BPWS assures that a CRDA willnot result in fuel failure. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. TheRWM and the Rod Sequence Control System (RSCS) are designed to protectagainst reactivity insertions which would result in fuel enthalpies greaterthan 280 calories per gram. The BPWS method of rod withdrawal has beenanalyzed and determined to be a more effective and conservative methodof minimizing rod worth during withdrawal of the first 50% of the controlrods. Therefore, no increase in the possibility of an excessive reactivityinsertion accident is introduced. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reductionin the margin of safety. The area of main concern for the CRDA is the highrod worth area from 100 percent control rod density to approximately 20percent power. Enforcement of the BPWS by the RWM will prevent inadvertentmovement of control rods in these vulnerable areas where a CRDA could causemajor fuel damage. A similar unit and cycle specific control rod sequenceprogram is currently in use at BSEP. Incorporation of the BPWS requirementinto the TS will mandate its use thereby maintaining the margin of safety.The NRC has approved this methodology in its SER of October 11, 1985 andconcluded that it is preferable for Group Notch Rod Sequence Control Systemplants to have the improved pattern control of the BPWS. </ITAG>The Staff has reviewed the CPandamp;L determinations and is in agreementwith them. The staff adds the following for the addition of the word ``Operational''before the word ``Condition'' on page 3/4 1-14. One of the Commission'sexamples of amendments that are considered not likely to involve significanthazards considerations is a purely administrative change to the TS, forexample, a change to achieve consistency throughout the TS correction ofan error, or a change in nomenclature (see 51 FR 7751). Adding the word``Operational'' before the word ``Condition'' fits this example becauseit achieves consistency throughout the TS Accordingly, the Commission proposesto determine that these changes do not involve a significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3297. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>R. E. Jones, General Counsel, CarolinaPower andamp; Light Company, P. O. Box 1551, Raleigh, North Carolina 27602<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Elinor G. Adensam <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company et al., Docket No. 50-400, ShearonHarris Nuclear Power Plant, Unit 1, Wake and Chatham Counties, North Carolina</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 4, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment deletesTechnical Specification 3.3.3.7, ``Chlorine Detection Systems,'' LimitingCondition of Operation, and the associated Surveillance Requirement 4.7.6.d.5which verifies that on a high chlorine test signal the control room emergencyfiltration system automatically isolates the control room. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards in 10 CFR 50.92(c) for determiningwhether a significant hazards consideration exists. A proposed amendmentto an Operating License for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityof consequences of an accident previously evaluated, or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated, or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee has evaluated the proposed amendment against the standardsin 10 CFR 50.92 and has determined the following. <ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.The Chlorine Detection System consists of two independent chlorine detectortrains with each train consisting of a detector at each Control Room AreaVentilation System intake (both normal and emergency) and a detector atthe chlorine storage area. The purpose of the system is to ensure thatsufficient capability is available to promptly detect and initiate protectiveaction in the event of an accidental chlorine release from either an onsiteor an offsite location. Deletion of the Chlorine Detection System doesnot affect the probability of an accidental release of chlorine, therefore,only the consequences of such an event must be addressed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The storage area detectors alarm and isolate the control room in theevent of a release of chlorine at the storage area. The Company does notstore large quantities (i.e., quantities greater than 20 pounds) of liquidchlorine onsite at SHNPP, therefore, there is no possibility of an accidentalonsite release of chlorine which could potentially affect operators. Assuch, deletion of the storage area chlorine detectors can not increasethe consequences of an accidental onsite release of chlorine. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The chlorine detectors located at the Control Room Area VentilationSystem intakes are intended to provide protection in the event of accidentaloffsite release of chlorine. The Company has performed a probabilisticrisk assessment to determine the probability of an accidental chlorinerelease in the vicinity of SHNPP. The analyses calculated the probabilityof accidents involving the transportation of chlorine on U. S. Highway1 and on the Seaboard Coast railroad line, the only major routes of transportationof liquid chlorine near the SHNPP site. The results of the analysis showthat the total probability of an accidental release of chlorine which resultsin toxic chlorine concentrations in the control room being exceeded beforethe operators can don breathing apparatus is 2.5 x 10-8 per year. The totalprobability reflects an accident frequency of 2.2 x 10-8 per year for therailroad line and 3.0 x 10-9 per year for trucks on U. S. Highway 1. RegulatoryGuide 1.70 and the Standard Review Plan, NUREG-0800 do not require considerationof accidents with an annual probability of less than 10-7 per year. Therefore,deletion of the chlorine detectors located at the Control Room Area VentilationSystem intakes will not increase the consequences of an accidental offsiterelease of chlorine. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. Deletionof the Chlorine Detection System does not require the use of a new or differentsystem than currently exists, nor does it require existing systems to performfunctions for which they were not originally designed. Therefore, the proposedamendment does not create the possibility of a new or different kind ofaccident from any accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reductionin the margin of safety. The purpose of the Chlorine Detection System isto ensure that sufficient capability is available to promptly detect andinitiate protective action in the event of an accidental chlorine release.Caroline Power andamp; Light Company does not store liquid chlorine in quantitiesin excess of 20 pounds onsite at SHNPP. As such, an onsite chlorine releaseaccident is not a credible scenario. In addition, the Company has performeda probabilistic risk assessment to determine the probability of an accidentalchlorine release in the vicinity of SHNPP. The analyses calculated theprobability of accidents involving the transportation of chlorine on U.S.Highway 1 and on the Seaboard Cost railroad line, the only major routesof transportation of liquid chlorine near the SHNPP site. The results ofthe analysis show that the total probability of an accident [SIC] releaseof chlorine which results in toxic chlorine concentrations in the controlroom being exceeded before the operators can don breathing apparatus is2.5 x 10-8 per year. The total probability reflects an accident frequencyof 2.2 x 10-8 per year for the railroad line and 3.0 x 10-9 per year fortrucks on U.S. Highway 1. Regulatory Guide 1.70 and Standard Review Plan,NUREG-0800 do not require consideration of accidents with an annual probabilityof less than 10-7 per year. Since both an onsite and an offsite chlorinerelease accidents are no longer credible events, the proposed amendmentto delete the Chlorine Detection System does not reduce the margin of safety.</ITAG>Based on the above, the licensee has determined that the proposed amendmentdoes not involve a significant hazards consideration. The NRC staff hasreviewed the licensee's no significant hazards consideraton determinationand agrees with the licensee's analysis. Accordingly, the Commission proposesto determine that the requested amendment does not involve a significanthazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Cameron Village RegionalLibrary, 1930 Clark Avenue, Raleigh, North Carolina 27605. <T3>Attorney for licensees: </T3>R. E. Jones, General Counsel, CarolinaPower andamp; Light Company, P. O. Box 1551, Raleigh, North Carolina 27602<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Elinor G. Adensam <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-454 and 50-455, ByronNuclear Power Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Ogle County, Illinois; DocketNos. 50-456 and 50-457, Braidwood Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Will County,Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>December 12, 1988 <T3>Description of amendments request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise Technical Specifications 3/4.2.2.2.e of Appendix A of those licensesto replace the values of cycle-specific Fxy limits with a reference tothe Operating Limits Report, which contains the values of those limits.(The proposed amendment supersedes the proposed amendment dated July 11,1988 and noticed in the Federal Register on August 24, 1988, 53 FR 32291.)In addition, the Operating Limits Report has been included in the DefinitionsSection of the Technical Specifications (TS) to note that it is the unit-specificdocument that provides these limits for the current operating reload cycle.Furthermore, the definition notes that the values of these cycle-specificparameter limits are to be determined in accordance with the Specification6.9.1.9. This specification requires that the Operating Limits be determinedfor each reload cycle in accordance with the referenced NRC-approved methodologyfor these limits and consistent with the applicable limits of the safetyanalysis. Finally, this report and any mid-cycle revisions shall be providedto the NRC upon issuance. Generic Letter 88-16, dated October 4, 1988,from the NRC provided guidance to licensees on requests for removal ofthe values of cycle-specific Fxy limits from TS. Typographical errors inSection 6.9.1.7 are also corrected. The licensee's proposed amendment isin response to this Generic Letter. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The staff has evaluated this proposed amendment and determined thatit involves no significant hazards considerations. According to 10 CFR50.92(c), a proposed amendment to an operating license involves no significanthazards considerations if operation of the facility in accordance withthe proposed amendment would not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated; or 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated; or 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposedrevision to the License Condition is in accordance with the guidance providedin Generic Letter 88-16 for licensees requesting removal of of the valuesof cycle-specific Fxy limits from TS. The establishment of these limitsin accordance to an NRC-approved methodology and the incorporation of theselimits into the Operating Limits Report will ensure that proper steps havebeen taken to establish the values of these limits. Furthermore, the submittalof the Operating Limits Report will allow the staff to continue to trendthe values of these limits without the need for prior staff approval ofthese limits and without introduction of an unreviewed safety question.The revised specifications with the removal of the values of cycle-specificparameter limits and that addition of the referenced report for these limitsdoes not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfor those previously evaluated. They also don't involve a significant reductionin the margin of safety since the change does not alter the methods usedto establish these limits. Consequently, the proposed change on the removal of the values of cycle-specificlimits do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. Because the values of cycle-specific Fxy limits will continue to be determinedin accordance with an NRC-approved methodology and consistent with theapplicable limits of the safety analysis, these changes are administrativein nature and do not impact the operation of the facility in a manner thatinvolves significant hazards considerations. The proposed amendment does not alter the requirement that the plant beoperated within the limits for cycle-specific parameters nor the requiredremedial actions that must be taken when these limits are not met. Whileit is recognized that such requirements are essential to plant safety,the values of limits can be determined in accordance with NRC-approvedmethods without affecting nuclear safety. With the removal of the valuesof these limits from the technical specifications, they have been incorporatedinto the Operating Limits Report that is submitted to the Commission. Hence,appropriate measures exist to control the values of these limits. Thesechanges are administrative in nature and do not impact the operation ofthe facility in a manner that involves significant hazards considerations.Based on the preceding assessment, the staff believes this proposed amendmentinvolves no significant hazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>For Byron Station the RockfordPublic Library, 215 N. Wyman Street, Rockford, Illinois 61101; for BraidwoodStation the Wilmington Township Public Library, 201 S. Kankakee Street,Wilmington, Illinois 60481. <T3>Attorney to licensee: </T3>Michael Miller, Esquire; Sidley and Austin,National Plaza, Chicago, Illinois 60603. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Daniel R. Muller <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-373 and 50-374, LaSalleCounty Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, LaSalle County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>January 11, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The proposed amendments to OperatingLicense No. NPF-11 and Operating License No. NPF-18 would revise the LaSalleUnits 1 and 2 Technical Specifications by removing the applicability ofSpecification 3.0.4 from Technical Specification 3.6.5.2. In order to ensure that the secondary containment meets its design function,isolation valves are provided. The intent of this specification is to ensurethat all lines with isolation valves will be isolated if conditions existwhich require the secondary containment to perform this function. Thisintent may be met by either an automatic isolation valve or a closed valve(or otherwise isolated line). Since plant safety is not degraded when anautomatic isolation valve is inoperable, but secured in its isolated positionin accordance with this specification, the questions of contained plantoperation or start-up should only become one of other requirements andnot be based solely on secondary containment integrity. Since plant safetyis not degraded by operation with an isolated secondary isolation valve,it is reasonable to allow mode changes in this condition. In addition, this specification should be no more restrictive than similarspecifications concerning the primary containment such as Technical Specification3.4.7 for Main Steam Isolation Valves. Commonwealth Edison's position onthis issue was previously accepted by the NRC in a similar technical specificationamendment submittal concerning Technical Specification 3.6.3 for PrimaryContainment Isolation Valves. In the event the isolation of the secondary containment boundary, in accordancewith Technical Specification 3.6.5.2, causes another technical specificationsystem to become inoperable and the exemption from Specification 3.0.4is not allowed for that system, then the plant is restrained from start-upby that specification. In all cases, the effect upon other systems mustbe considered and applicable technical specifications followed. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether no significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from an accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee has determined, and the NRC staff agrees, that the proposedamendment will not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated because this proposed amendment does notaffect or degrade the secondary containment integrity, but merely allowsplant start-up with an inoperable automatic secondary containment isolationvalve provided that the affected penetration is isolated in accordancewith technical specification requirements. If the closed secondary containmentpenetration were to affect the operability of another system importantto safety, continued plant operation or start-up would be controlled bythe requirements of the applicable technical specifications for the affectedsystems. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated because the proposed revisions merely allowplant start-up with an inoperable automatic secondary containment isolationvalve provided that the affected penetration is isolated in accordancewith technical specification requirements and thus, does not affect ordegrade the secondary containment integrity. 3. Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety since the requirementsto isolate the secondary containment penetration effected by an inoperableautomatic isolation valve remain unchanged. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Public Library of IllinoisValley Community College, Rural Route No. 1, Oglesby, Illinois 61348 <T3>Attorney to licensee: </T3>Michael Miller, Esq., Sidley and Austin,One First National Plaza, Chicago, Illinois 60603. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Daniel R. Muller <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket No. 50-374, LaSalle County Station,Unit No. 2, LaSalle County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>December 2, 1988 supplementedJanuary 11, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments to OperatingLicense No. NPF-18 would revise the LaSalle Unit 2 Technical Specificationsby revising Table 3.8.3.2-1 to reflect new locations of breakers for Valve2E12-F009, Residual Heat Removal Shutdown Cooling Suction Isolation Valve.In order to increase the reliability of the Residual Heat Removal ShutdownCooling Isolation Valve (2E12-F009) at LaSalle County Station Unit 2, CommonwealthEdison Company is performing a modification which will replace the existingLimitorque operator with a larger operator. The new, larger operator requiresthe installation of larger capacity breakers (both normal and emergencyfeeds) which will not fit into the compartments occupied by the originalbreakers. The replacement breakers will be installed in larger compartmentswithin the same Motor Control Centers as the originals. The original breakerlocations are MCC 236Y-1 Comp. D5 and MCC 235X-1 Comp. C2. The new locationswill be MCC 236Y-1 Comp. B2 and MCC 235X-1 Comp. C2/C3, respectively. Theproposed Technical Specification amendment is an administrative changeintended to reflect the revised breaker compartment location of the newbreakers. The proposed Technical Specification amendment also deletes manufacturerpart number references from the subject table because of changes to thepart numbers. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether no significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from an accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee has determined, and the NRC staff agrees, that the proposedamendment will not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated because this proposed amendment reflectsthe change in location within the same motor control center of the breakercompartment used to control the Residual Heat Removal Shutdown CoolingSuction Isolation Valve 2E12-F009. It also deletes references to manufacturerpart numbers because of changes to the part numbers. The parts themselvesare unchanged, however, with respect to their form, fit and function. Thischange does not in any way compromise or change the basic function of theequipment affected. This proposal does not change the intent of the TechnicalSpecifications as defined in the bases. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated because the function of the breakers affectedis unchanged and all associated design requirements as required by theTechnical Specifications remain unchanged. 3. Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety because theproposed change is administrative in nature and reflects the revised breakercompartment location of the new breakers and has no effect on the marginof safety. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Public Library of IllinoisValley Community College, Rural Route No. 1, Ogelsby, Illinois 61348. <T3>Attorney to licensee: </T3>Michael I. Miller, Esquire; Sidley and Austin,One First National Plaza, Chicago, Illinois 60603. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Daniel R. Muller <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-254 and 50-265, Quad CitiesNuclear Power Station, Units 1 and 2, Rock Island County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>January 9, 1989 <T3>Description of amendments request: </T3>To improve the clarity of theQuad Cities Units 1 and 2 Facility Operating Licenses DPR-29 and 30, theyhave been retyped. Commonwealth Edison Company (CECo) requested that theybe reissued in their entirety as an amendment to the aforementioned FacilityOperating Licenses. This is an extension of Commonwealth Edison's on-goingeffort to improve the clarity of the Quad Cities Station Technical Specifications(TS). No technical changes were proposed; as a result, the amendment maybe considered to be strictly editorial in nature. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; (2) create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from an accident previously evaluated; or(3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. In accordancewith 10 CFR 50.92, CECo conducted an analysis of their proposed amendmentand concluded that it does not involve significant hazards consideration.This conclusion was based upon the determination that the operation ofQuad Cities Station in conformance with the proposed amendment: (1) Would not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated because this amendment does not changethe technical content of the currently approved Quad Cities Station Units1 and 2 Facility Operating Licenses DPR-29 and 30. This amendment is editorialin nature and is merely sought to improve the clarity and legibility ofthe Units 1 and 2 licenses. (2) Would not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated because the proposed amendment containsinsignificant content changes of the currently approved Units 1 and 2 FacilityOperating Licenses (DPR-29 and 30). There are no changes to the licenserequirements effecting plant conditions of operations. (3) Would not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety becausethe proposed amendment is merely a retyped version of the current NRC approvedUnits 1 and 2 Facility Operating Licenses (DPR-29 and 30). There are notechnical changes associated with this amendment and its considered tobe editorial in nature. NRC staff reviewed the licensee's application and analysis of no significanthazards consideration. Based upon this review and the above discussion,the NRC staff proposes to determine that this amendment request does notinvolve significant hazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Dixon Public Library, 221Hennepin Avenue, Dixon, Illinois 61021. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Michael I. Miller, Esquire; Sidley andAustin, One First National Plaza, Chicago, Illinois 60603. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Daniel R. Muller <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-254 and 50-265, Quad CitiesNuclear Power Station, Units 1 and 2, Rock Island County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>January 19, 1989 <T3>Description of amendments request: </T3>Commonwealth Edison Company(CECo) proposed to amend Operating Licenses DPR-29 and DPR-30 for QuadCities Station with regards to the surveillance requirements for CO<T2>2</T2> fire hose stations. The existing Technical Specification (TS)4.12.E. does not differentiate between the two types of hoses that existat Quad Cities Station, i.e. water and CO<T2>2</T2> hoses. Furthermore, the specifications do not differentiatebetween the type of surveillances that are performed on these hoses. Asthe hoses are constructed of differing materials (the water hoses are composedof a woven type material while the CO<T2>2</T2> hoses are made of a rubber-based material), it is appropriatethat the surveillances differ. Although the TSs do not differentiate between the types of surveillancerequirements for CO<T2>2</T2> and water hoses, the National Fire Protection Association (NFPA)Codes do call out specific requirements for CO<T2>2</T2> hose reel surveillance activities other than those for waterhose reels. Quad Cities Station has committed to meet the current coderequirements of NFPA 12, Section 1-11.2.7, or replace the CO<T2>2</T2> hoses in accordance with the intervals specified in the Code.The station will administratively ensure, via its surveillance trackingprogram, that the CO<T2>2</T2> hose surveillances are performed at the NFPA specified intervals.It is CECo's judgment that these administrative controls are adequate and,therefore, there is no need to specify the CO<T2>2</T2> surveillance requirements in the TS. This position is furthersupported by NRC Generic Letter 88-12 which allows a licensee to deletenon-safe shutdown related fire protection equipment from the TS. Localapplication of CO<T2>2</T2> is not an integral portion of the fire protection/fire fightingplan at Quad Cities Station due to the acquisition of other safer, moreversatile fire extinguishing units. Consequently, for reasons discussed above, CECo has proposed to exemptCO<T2>2</T2> fire hose stations from the requirements of TS 4.12.E. and prescribeinstead, an annual operational pressure test (in concert with NFPA requirements).<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; (2) create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from an accident previously evaluated; or(3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. In accordancewith 10 CFR 50.92, CECo conducted an analysis of their proposed amendmentand concluded that it does not involve a significant hazards consideration.This conclusion was based upon the determination that the operation ofQuad Cities Station in conformance with the proposed amendment: (1) Would not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated because the proposed amendment merelyclarifies that existing TS surveillance requirements apply only to waterhoses. CO<T2>2</T2> hose surveillances will continue to be performed in accordancewith the requirements of the NFPA Code which provide definitive guidancefor such hoses. Although these CO<T2>2</T2> hose surveillances are not delineated in TS, they will be performedas part of the Station's Surveillance Program. Additionally, these CO<T2>2</T2> hose reels are not required as part of the Quad Cities StationFire Plans which have been approved for use in shutting down the plantin the event of a fire. (2) Would not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated because there are no changes beingmade to the plant, plant hardware, or how the plant is operated as a resultof this change. Appropriate surveillances will continue to be performedon both the CO<T2>2</T2> and water hoses. This amendment clarifies the surveillance requirementswhich are performed on water and CO<T2>2</T2> hoses at the Station assuring that the hoses receive the propertype of surveillance which could detect any hose material degradation.It should also be noted that the CO<T2>2</T2> hose reels are not utilized as part of the station's fire plans.(3) Would not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety becausethe proposed amendment does not decrease the frequency over which eitherthe CO<T2>2</T2> or water hoses are tested. But rather, it will differentiatebetween the type of tests that are to be performed on the hoses based onthe type of material and service conditions that the hose encounters. Thechange attempts to better describe the appropriateness of a given surveillanceand ensures that surveillances are performed which would detect potentialhose degradation by recognizing the differences between the two hose types.Additionally, the TS bases are unchanged as a result of this change. NRC staff reviewed the licensee's application and analysis of no significanthazards consideration. Based upon this review, and the above discussion,the NRC staff proposes to determine that this amendment request does notinvolve significant hazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Dixon Public Library, 221Hennepin Avenue, Dixon, Illinois 61021. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Michael I. Miller, Esquire; Sidley andAustin, One First National Plaza, Chicago, Illinois 60603. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Daniel R. Muller <ITAG tagnum="84">Consumers Power Company, Docket No. 50-155, Big Rock Point Plant,Charlevoix County, Michigan </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 19, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed license amendmentwould change the Big Rock Point Plant Facility Operating License (FOL)to allow for an increase in the amount of byproduct material the plantmay possess and use from 10.5 curies of Cesium-137 to 45 curies of Cesium-137as sealed sources. The proposed change would permit the purchase of a newcalibration source of greater strength which could provide the capabilityto functionally check and calibrate portable radiation detection instrumentson all ranges with greater accuracy. The new sealed calibration sourceand the associated housing would be J L Shepherd Model 89 design. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists [10 CFR 50.92(c)]. A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has evaluated the proposed change against the above standardsas required by 10 CFR 50.91(a)(1). The Commission has reviewed the licensee'sevaluation and agrees with it. The licensee noted that the NRC, in grantingregistration for the J L Shepherd Model 89 source under 10 CFR 30.32(g)(1)and 10 CFR 32.210, required an NRC evaluation of radiation safety informationto ensure that the radiation safety properties of the source were adequateto protect health and minimize danger to life and property. By grantingregistration, the NRC has concluded that the registered source meets thesafety criteria of applicable industry standards and/or NRC formulatedrequirements. The licensee concluded that the change to the FOL proposedfor the use of a licensed calibration source of greater strength than previouslyin use involves no significant hazards consideration because: (1) The change does not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated because the proposedchange does not involve a change to plant safety equipment, or a changeto the current requirements of the Limiting Conditions of Operation orthe Surveillance Requirements specified in the Technical Specifications.(2) The change does not create the possibility of a new or different kindof accident from any accident previously evaluated since the change doesnot involve a change to plant safety equipment, or other equipment thatmay impact plant safety equipment. The change will permit calibration ofportable radiation detection instruments with greater accuracy. (3) The change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin ofsafety because the change does not impact any Limiting Condition of Operation,Action Statement, or Surveillance Requirement specified in the TechnicalSpecifications. Based on the above, the Commission proposes to determine that the proposedamendment involves no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>North Central Michigan College,1515 Howard Street, Petoskey, Michigan 49770. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Judd L. Bacon, Esquire, Consumers PowerCompany, 212 West Michigan Avenue, Jackson, Michigan 49201. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Theodore R. Quay, Acting. <ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-413 and 50-414, CatawbaNuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, York County, South Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>October 5, 1988, as supplemented December30, 1988, and January 27, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldrevise the Technical Specifications (TSs) to: (a) allow one-time waiverto the requirements for a complete diesel generator (DG) overhaul and forthe testing as stated in the first footnote to Table 4.8-1, (b) changethe counting of failures on DGs from a ``per nuclear unit basis'' to a``per diesel generator basis'' - TS 4.8.1.1.3, and (c) correct the numbersof surveillances referenced in the first footnote to Table 4.8-1. Eachunit at Catawba Nuclear Station has two independent DGs manufactured byIMO Delaval, Incorporated. These DGs are used to provide an emergency standbysource of power to the equipment required to safely shutdown the reactorin the event of a loss of offsite power. Each DG is controlled by a separate 60 psi pneumatic control system thatwill trip the engine when the setpoints of various parameters are reached.This process is achieved by the use of six sensors on the engine and oneon the control panel. All of these seven sensors are manufactured by CaliforniaControls Company, Inc. (Calcon) and are of one particular model CalconB4400. The last four valid failures of DG 1A can be attributed to the failureof this Calcon B4400 pressure sensor. These failures took place on April12, April 19, April 25, and May 5, 1988. More information relating to thespecifics of these failures can be found in the licensee's letter datedMay 25, 1988. As stated in its 10 CFR 21 notice of April 29, 1988, and supplemented May12, 1988, Calcon recommended and approved the remanufacturing of the B4400sensors. The Catawba sensors were actually remanufactured on site by aCalcon representative. All Calcon B4400 sensors were replaced on DGs withthe remanufactured Calcon sensors. Based on the discoveries made by Calcon,it is concluded that the 6th, 7th, 8th, and 9th valid failures within thelast 100 valid starts on Unit 1A DG are attributed to the same root cause:inadequate design and manufacture of the Calcon B4400 pressure sensors.On October 25, 1988, an invalid failure of DG 1B occurred. This was notof the same failure mode as the failures of DG 1A. More information maybe found in the licensee's letter dated November 23, 1988. It is the licensee's intention to modify the DG trip system. The modificationswould delete all pneumatic trip instrumentation from the DGs and replaceit with electric trip function. However, these modifications are not connectedto the waiver request for rezeroing the four failures on 1A Diesel Generator.The new pneumatic control system pressure sensors were specifically approvedby the manufacturer and acceptable reliability of the pneuamtic controlsystem has been demonstrated. The proposed changes to TS 4.8.1.1.3 revise the reporting requirement froma per nuclear unit basis to a per DG basis. Test failures are already determinedon a per DG basis as discussed in the footnote to Table 4.8-1. The reportingrequirement is being changed to a per DG basis to be consistent with thetesting criteria, and to avoid the need for a dual counting system, onefor determining test frequency and one for determining reports. The testingfrequency determination assures that a reliability of 95% is maintained.The proposed changes to the footnote to Table 4.8-1 merely correct typographicalerrors. The correct surveillance numbers will be referenced. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided certain examples (51 FR 7744) of actionslikely to involve no significant hazards considerations. One of the examples(i) is a purely administrative change to TSs. Change (c) to correct typographicalerrors related to the numbers of surveillances referenced in the firstfootnote to Table 4.8-1 matches this example. Changes (a) and (b) do notmatch the examples. However, the Commission has provided standards fordetermining whether a significant hazards consideration exists (10 CFR50.92(c). A proposed amendment to an operating license for a facility involvesno significant hazards considerations if operation of the facility in accordancewith the proposed amendment would not: (1) involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated;or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reductionin a margin of safely. Proposed change (a) to allow a one-time waiver to discount failures associatedwith the Calcon pressure sensors does not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluatedbecause the new pressure sensors have been tested, their installation wasapproved by the manufacturer, and acceptable reliability of DG 1A was demonstratedby 47 valid successful starts since May 5, 1988. Forty-five of these testswere conducted in accordance with the routine surveillance requirementsof 4.8.1.1.2a.4) and 4.8.1.1.2a.5). The remaining two tests were performedin accordance with the 184-day testing requirement of 4.8.1.1.2a.4) and4.8.1.1.2a.5). The only difference between these two methods is a pre-lubingof the turbocharger bearings. Proposed change (b) to modify the reporting requirements does not involvea significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated because this change would make the reporting requirementsconsistent with the testing requirements and would avoid having to keepup one set of numbers for testing and another set for reporting. Proposed changes (a) and (b) do not create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated becauseDG 1A will continue to function as before, and no new modes of operationare introduced. In addition, proposed change (a) would improve the reliabilityof DG 1A because it would reduce the wear and tear associated with frequenttesting. Proposed change (a) does not involve a significant reduction in a marginof safety because the new pressure sensors would enhance the reliabilityof DG 1A. Proposed change (b) would not affect the operation of DG 1A.Accordingly, the Commission has concluded that the requested changes meetthe three standards and, therefore, has made a proposed determination thatthe requested license amendments do not involve a significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>York County Library, 138East Black Street, Rock Hill, South Carolina 29730 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Albert Carr, Duke Power Company, 422South Church Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28242 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>David B. Matthews <ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-369 and 50-370, McGuire NuclearStation, Units 1 and 2, Mecklenburg County, North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>May 14, 1986, as supplemented September21, 1986, and revised April 25, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments woulddelete Technical Specification (TS) Table 3.6-1, ``Secondary ContainmentBypass Leakage Paths,'' and TS Table 3.6-2, ``Containment Isolation Valves.''TS Bases 3/4 6.3 would be supplemented to note that ``Containment isolationvalves are listed in FSAR Table 6.2.4-1. Those valves with a required isolationtime have a value given in the `MAX ISOLATION TIME (SEC)' column. Penetrationtest type (type B, type C, or none) is listed in the `TEST TYPE' columnof the table for each containment penetration.'' References to these tableswithin TSs 4.6.1.1, 3.6.1.2c, 3.6.3 and 4.6.3.1 would be similarly deleted.TS 3.6.3 specifies four alternate actions to be taken in Modes 1, 2, 3,and 4 if at least one containment isolation valve is operable in each affectedcontainment penetration that is open, but with one or more isolation valvesinoperable. The proposed amendments would add a fifth action to permitthe operation of manual penetration valves on an intermittent basis underadministrative control. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>TS Table 3.6-1 lists containment penetrations and identifies theirservice, location and 10 CFR 50 Appendix J test types. TS Table 3.6-2 listscontainment isolation valves and identifies their function and maximumallowed isolation time. The contents of existing TS Tables 3.6.1 and 3.6.2have been added to the McGuire FSAR as Table 6.2.4-1. Hence, deletion ofthe tables from the TS and changes to reference the corresponding FSARtable would not change the limiting conditions for operation (LCO) or surveillancerequirements (SRs). In the event future changes are needed to this information in the FSAR,the proposed changes would be evaluated in accordance with the processdescribed in 10 CFR 50.59. Under 10 CFR 50.59, proposed changes determinedby the licensee not to involve an unreviewed safety question, may be madewithout prior Commission approval. A report of such changes, includinga summary of the safety evaluation of each, would be submitted annuallyto the Commission. The Commission has determined as part of its implementationpolicy for TS improvements that the subject penetrations and valves areappropriate for this process. Certain manual valves are permitted to be opened during operation as longas they are administratively controlled. Operation of these valves currentlyallows testing, maintenance and other activities on the following systems:reactor coolant pump motor oil drain, equipment decontamination, containmenthydrogen sampling and refueling water. Presently, the footnote ``may beopened on an intermittent basis under administrative control'' is in TSTable 3.6-2. Upon deletion of the entire table, this provision would beretained within the TS by adding it to TS 3.6.3. Thus, no change in existingrequirements would be made. The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). We have reviewedthe licensee's proposed changes to the TS and conclude that the proposedchanges would not: (1) Involve a significant increase in the probability of occurrence orconsequences of an accident previously analyzed. Since there would be nochanges to the LCO or SR, no changes in operability of the subject equipmentwould occur. Accordingly, there would be no effect on a previously analyzedaccident. (2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany previously analyzed. Since there would be no changes in hardware orin the way the plant is operated, the potential for an unanalyzed accidentwould not be created. No new failure modes would be introduced. (3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Since the proposedchanges would not affect the consequences of any accident previously analyzedor create new or different ones, there would be no reduction in any marginof safety. Accordingly, the staff proposes to determine that the application for amendmentsinvolves no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Atkins Library, Universityof North Carolina, Charlotte (UNCC Station), North Carolina 28223 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Albert Carr, Duke Power Company, 422South Church Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28242 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>David B. Matthews <ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-369 and 50-370, McGuire NuclearStation, Units 1 and 2, Mecklenburg County, North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>June 19, 1987, as supplemented February24 and November 23, 1988, and January 6, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldgrant a one-time extension of the allowed outage time for each of the twotrains of the Control Area Ventilation (VC) System to provide for systemmodifications to improve reliability. Technical Specification (TS) 3.7.6requires both independent VC Systems to be operable in all modes. Withone VC System inoperable during Modes 1, 2, 3 or 4, the TS requires theoperators to restore the inoperable system to operable status within 7days or both McGuire Units are to be in at least Hot Standby within thenext 6 hours and in Cold Shutdown within the following 30 hours. Similarly,with one VC System inoperable during Modes 5 or 6, the operator is to restorethe inoperable system to operable status within 7 days or initiate andmaintain operation of the remaining operable VC System in the recirculationmode. The proposed change would add a footnote to TS 3.7.6, referencedafter the specified 7 days, to state that an allowed outage time extensionto 21 days is granted for each train, one at a time, to allow system modificationsrelated to replacement of the two 50% capacity outside air filter fanswith one 100% capacity fan. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The VC System is designed to maintain the habitability of the ControlRoom area. A modification to replace the existing fans in the outside airpressure filter train is needed because these fans are unreliable (as evidencedby the need for frequent bearing replacement and stress cracks in the frames)and because nuclear grade replacement parts can not be obtained from themanufacturer who is no longer in business. Presently, each filter traincontains two 50% capacity fans that operate in parallel. The modificationwould replace the two 50% capacity fans with a single 100% fan per filtertrain. Associated changes to ducts, instrumentation, and dampers wouldalso be made. Only one of the two redundant trains is needed to maintain Control Roomhabitability after a severe accident, and operability of the opposite trainwill be demonstrated by testing prior to starting the modification. Thesystem design provides for cross-connect capability between trains andsupporting systems, sufficient to compensate for most credible failuresduring the modification. Thus, sustained failure of the remaining trainduring modification of the opposite train is highly unlikely. The occurrenceprobability for a severe accident during the few days of modification iseven smaller. Nevertheless, should it be needed, air masks and self-containedbreathing apparatus are available in the Control Room as a backup. Thus,the risks associated with implementing the modification are negligible,while the benefits to safety of the completed modification (a more reliablesystem) are significant. The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). We have reviewedthe proposed changes to the TS and conclude on the basis above, that theywould not (1) involve a significant increase in the probability of occurrenceor consequences of an accident previously analyzed, or (2) involve a significantreduction in a margin of safety. Additionally, the function of the systemwould be achieved in the same manner without the introduction of any newor novel equipment, procedures or techniques. Therefore, the proposed changeswould not (3) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any previously analyzed. Rather, the changes are proposed to enhancesafety by achieving a more reliable system. Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determine that the proposed changesinvolve no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Atkins Library, Universityof North Carolina, Charlotte (UNCC Station), North Carolina 28223 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Albert Carr, Duke Power Company, 422South Church Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28242 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>David B. Matthews <ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, Docket No. 50-370, McGuire Nuclear Station, Unit2, Mecklenburg County, North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 7, 1985 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment woulddelete paragraph 2.C(12) and referenced Table 1 from McGuire Unit 2 OperatingLicense NPF-17. This paragraph is titled ``Reactor Trip Breakers'' andstates that: <ITAG tagnum="21">a. By June 3, 1983, the licensee shall provide a program plan forconducting a life-test of the undervoltage trip attachment. The life-testprogram is to be reviewed by the staff before implementation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The licensee shall modify the design of the automatic shunt tripof the main reactor trip breakers to install an independent fusing scheme.This modification shall be implemented on a schedule consistent with theschedule requirements of the NRC Salem Task Force generic program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. The licensee shall implement the reactor trip breaker and reactortrip bypass breaker testing and reporting as described in Table 1. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">d. Within 60 days from issuance of this amendment, the licensee shallprovide the upgraded post-trip review procedures for NRC staff review.</ITAG>Table 1 specifies periodic testing and reporting requirements for reactortrip breakers and reactor trip bypass breakers. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>In early 1983, following failures of Westinghouse DS-416 circuit breakersthroughout the industry and at McGuire, the Commission added paragraph2.C(12) to the operating license for McGuire Unit 2 to require specificmeasures to improve the reliability of reactor trip breakers. The licenseenotes that the specific measures required by each of the above subparagraphshave been completed and that paragraph 2.C(12) of NPF-17 is, therefore,unnecessary and should be deleted. Specifically: a. The program plan required by 2.C(12)a was provided to the NRC by letterdated June 3, 1983, and subsequently approved. b. The design modifications required by 2.C(12)b have been performed. c. Testing of reactor trip breakers and reactor trip bypass breakers hasbeen addressed and approved subsequent to issuance of paragraph 2.C.(12)c.and referenced Table 1 by McGuire Unit 2 Amendment 55 (and Unit 1 Amendment74). The amendments added periodic testing requirements to the McGuireTechnical Specifications (TS) in accordance with NRC Generic Letter 85-09,``Technical Specifications for Generic Letter 83-28, Item 4.3.'' d. The procedures required by 2.C(12)d. were provided by letter dated July22, 1983. Thus, the proposed amendments would remove obsolete (completed) requirementsor requirements expressed elsewhere in the license as a TS requirement.The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application of thestandards for determining whether a significant hazard exists by providingcertain examples (51 FR 7744). One of the examples of actions involvingno significant hazards considerations is example (i) ``a purely administrativechange to technical specifications; for example, a change to achieve consistencythroughout the technical specifications, correction of an error, or a changein nomenclature.'' The requested change to delete obsolete text or redundantrequirements has no safety implication, is purely administrative, and matchesthis example. Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determine that the proposed amendmentwould involve no significant hazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Atkins Library, Universityof North Carolina, Charlotte (UNCC Station), North Carolina 28223 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Albert Carr, Duke Power Company, 422South Church Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28242 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>David B. Matthews <ITAG tagnum="84">Duquesne Light Company, Docket No. 50-334, Beaver Valley Power Station,Unit No. 1, Shippingport, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 18, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise Table 3.6-1, ``Containment Penetrations,'' to identify penetrations57-3 and 57-4 as spares. These penetrations contain tubing for the sealedpressure system which is currently used for Type A leakage testing of thecontainment. However, other methods are available and the licensee, therefore,proposes to cut the tubing and cap the ends, and treat the penetrationsas spares from then on. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists in accordance with 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposedamendment to an operating license for a facility involves no significanthazard consideration if operation of the facility in accordance with theproposed amendment would not (1) involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated, (2) createthe possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accidentpreviously evaluated, or (3) involve a significant reduction in a marginof safety. The proposed amendment would permit the licensee to weld caps onto tubingthat are currently closed by isolation valves. The caps will serve as amore secure boundary than the isolation valves. The hardware modificationwould eliminate the tubing as a potential containment leak path. The affectedtubing does not by itself cause design basis accidents, and its cappingshut reduces potential leakage after accidents. Therefore, the answersto questions (1) and (2) would be negative. The affected tubing was notfactored into any safety analysis; its capping would have no effect onprevious analyses. The answer to question (3) is also negative. The staff, therefore, proposes to determine that the requested amendmentinvolve no significant hazards. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>B. F. Jones Memorial Library,663 Franklin Avenue, Aliquippa, Pennsylvania 15001. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Charnoff, Esquire, Jay E. Silberg,Esquire, Shaw, Pittman, Potts andamp; Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington,DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Duquesne Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-334 and 50-412 Beaver ValleyPower Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Shippingport, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 5, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The Technical Specificationsfor Beaver Valley Units 1 and 2 would be amended in the following ways:(1) The Unit 1 index would be updated. This is a purely editorial change.(2) Section 4.4.5.2, steam generator inspection requirements would be revisedby removing reference to the specific year of the ASME code used for tubeinspection. This would eliminate future need for amendments whenever theASME code is updated, and is consistent with the current section 4.0.5.This change is editorial. (3) Section 6.9.1, monthly operating reports, radial peaking factor limitreports, and special reports will be specified to be submitted to the NRCDocument Control Desk, rather than specific NRC organization units. Thischange is consistent with 10 CFR 50.4(b)(1), and is editorial. (4) Basis section 3/4.2.2 and 3/4.2.3, paragraph on fuel rod bowing penaltywould be revised to reflect updated approved information. This change iseditorial.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application ofthese standards (51 FR 7744). One of the examples, example (i), involves``purely administrative change to technical specification: for example,a change to achieve consistency throughout the technical specification,correction of an error.'' The requested changes fully match this example and the staff, therefore,proposes to determine that the changes involve no significant hazards.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>B. F. Jones Memorial Library,663 Franklin Avenue, Aliquippa, Pennsylvania 15001. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Charnoff, Esquire, Jay E. Silberg,Esquire, Shaw, Pittman, Potts andamp; Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington,DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Duquesne Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-334 and 50-412, Beaver ValleyPower Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Shippingport, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 5, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise Specification 3.1.3.1 to clarify the LCO and action requirementsconcerning control rod operability. These changes reflect recommended wordingprovided to the NRC by a Westinghouse letter (NS-NRC-84-2990 December 2,1984) and subsequently incorporated into the Millstone Unit 3 TechnicalSpecifications. The proposed changes provide editorial clarification of the control rodaction requirements and incorporate a new action statement to address multipleimmovable, but trippable, control rods. These control rods may become immovableas a result of a rod control system failure and will not step in or out,but would drop if a reactor trip were initiated. The additional actionstatement allows continued plant operation when in this condition sincethe control rods would still be capable of performing their safety function.Without this additional action statement and more than one control rodis immovable, but trippable, the plant would otherwise be forced to repairthe failure within 6 hours or shutdown. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists in accordance with 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposedamendment to an operating license for a facility involves no significanthazard consideration if operation of the facility in accordance with theproposed amendment would not (1) involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated, (2) createthe possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accidentpreviously evaluated, or (3) involve a significant reduction in a marginof safety. As stated above, all changes are editorial clarification except the additionof a new action statement. While the new action statement would permitthe plant be operated for a limited period when multiple control rods areimmovable, it does require that these rods be trippable, i.e. capable ofperforming their intended safety function. No hardware change is involved.Thus the answers to the first two questions are negative. No assumptionsof any safety analysis in the licensing basis is affected; thus the answerto the third question is also negative. The staff, therefore, proposes to determine that the requested amendmentinvolve no significant hazards. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>B. F. Jones Memorial Library,663 Franklin Avenue, Aliquippa, Pennsylvania 15001. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Charnoff, Esquire, Jay E. Silberg,Esquire, Shaw, Pittman, Potts andamp; Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington,DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Duquesne Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-334 and 50-412, Beaver ValleyPower Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Shippingport, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 12, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise specification 3.4.6.1 for each unit to permit both containment atmosphereparticulate and gaseous radiation monitors (both are RCS leakage detectioninstruments) be inoperable for up to 12 hours due solely to calibrationor maintenance activities. The current specification would require commencementof shutdown activities within one hour. The hardware of these instrumentsis installed in such a way that both radiation monitors must be taken outof service to perform the required periodic calibration and/or maintenanceon either radiation monitor. The time required to perform a complete calibrationon these radiation monitors is greater than six hours, while the currentspecification allows only one hour of outage time. The proposed new actionstatement would avert the need for a reactor shutdown just to perform suchcalibration and/or maintenance. RCS leakage will continue to be monitoredby the containment sump instrumentation, and by an enhanced RCS water inventorybalance measurement. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists in accordance with 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposedamendment to an operating license for a facility involves no significanthazard consideration if operation of the facility in accordance with theproposed amendment would not (1) involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated, (2) createthe possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accidentpreviously evaluated, or (3) involve a significant reduction in a marginof safety. The proposed amendment would relax the time both radiation monitors areallowed out of service, but a compensatory measure would be imposed duringthat time. There is no modification to existing plant hardware or operatingprocedures. The monitors themselves do not cause design basis accidentsor are they used to mitigate the consequences of such accidents. Hencethe answers to both questions (1) and (2) are negative. There is furthermoreno change in the assumptions of any previous analysis; the answer to question(3) is also negative. The staff therefore proposes to determine that the requested amendmentinvolve no significant hazards. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>B. F. Jones Memorial Library,663 Franklin Avenue, Aliquippa, Pennsylvania 15001. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Charnoff, Esquire, Jay E. Silberg,Esquire, Shaw, Pittman, Potts andamp; Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington,DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Florida Power and Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-250 and 50-251, TurkeyPoint Plant Units 3 and 4, Dade County, Florida </ITAG><T3>Date of amendments request: </T3>September 27, 1988 <T3>Description of amendments request: </T3>The amendments would modifyTurkey Point Technical Specifications (TS) Sections 3.0 and 4.0 in accordancewith the guidance supplied by NRC Generic Letter (GL) 87-09. The guidanceprovided in the GL addresses the problems of unnecessary shutdowns, andconflicts in surveillance requirements related to mode changes. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided criteria for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationsif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee addressed the above three criteria in the amendment applicationand made a proposed no significant hazards consideration determination.In regard to the first criterion the licensee provided the following analysis:<ITAG tagnum="21">For the changes intended to achieve consistency with the recommendationsof Generic Letter 87-09 ``Sections 3.0 and 4.0 of the Standard TechnicalSpecifications (STS) on the Applicability of Limiting Conditions for Operationand Surveillance Requirements,'' the Staff has previously evaluated thesechanges in the generic letter and determined that the modifications willresult in improved technical specifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Specification 3.0.4 unduly restricts facility operation when conformanceto the ACTION requirements provides an acceptable level of safety for continuedoperation. For an LCO (Limiting Commission for Operation) that has ACTIONrequirements permitting continued operation for an unlimited period oftime, entry into an operational mode or other specified condition of operationshould be permitted in accordance with those ACTION requirements. Thisis consistent with the NRC's regulatory requirements for an LCO. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">It is overly conservative to assume that systems or components areinoperable when a surveillance requirement has not been performed. A 24-hourtime limit has been included in Specification 4.0.3 allowing a delay ofthe required actions to permit the performance of the missed surveillance.The NRC has concluded that the 24-hour time limit would balance the risksassociated with an allowance for completing the surveillance within thisperiod against the risks associated with the potential for a plant upsetand challenge to safety systems when the alternative is a shutdown to complywith ACTION requirements before the surveillance can be completed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The NRC has concluded that the potential for a plant upset and challengeto safety systems is heightened if surveillances are performed during ashutdown to comply with ACTION requirements. Specification 4.0.4 has beenmodified to note that its provisions shall not prevent passage throughor to operational modes as required to comply with ACTION requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the changes intended to achieve consistency with the Westinghouse- Standard Technical Specifications (WSTS), Draft Revision 5, the intentof the Specifications will not be changed nor will operating limitationsof the Technical Specifications be changed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Therefore, the proposed changes will not significantly affect theprobability or consequences of accidents previously analyzed. </ITAG>With respect to the second criterion the licensee stated: <ITAG tagnum="21">The changes being proposed by FPL Florida Power and Light to achieveconsistency with Generic Letter 87-09 and the WSTS will not lead to materialprocedure changes or to physical modifications. Therefore, the proposedchanges do not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident.</ITAG>In regard to the third criterion the licensee provided the following statement:<ITAG tagnum="21">For the changes intended to achieve consistency with the recommendationsof Generic Letter 87-09 ``Sections 3.0 and 4.0 of the Standard TechnicalSpecifications (STS) on the Applicability of Limiting Conditions for Operationand Surveillance Requirements,'' the Staff has previously evaluated thesechanges in the generic letter and determined that the modifications willresult in improved technical specifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Specification 3.0.4 unduly restricts facility operation when conformanceto the ACTION requirements provides an acceptable level of safety for continuedoperation. For an LCO that has ACTION requirements permitting continuedoperation for an unlimited period of time, entry into an operational modeor other specified condition of operation should be permitted in accordancewith those ACTION requirements. This consistent with the NRC's regulatoryrequirements for an LCO. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">It is overly conservative to assume that systems or components areinoperable when a surveillance requirement has not been performed. A 24-hourtime limit has been included in Specification 4.0.3 allowing a delay ofthe required actions to permit the performance of the missed surveillance.The NRC has concluded that the 24-hour time limit would balance the risksassociated with an allowance for completing the surveillance within thisperiod against the risks associated with the potential for a plant upsetand challenge to safety systems when the alternative is a shutdown to complywith ACTION requirements before the surveillance can be completed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The NRC has concluded that the potential for a plant upset and challengeto safety systems is heightened if surveillances are performed during ashutdown to comply with ACTION requirements. Specification 4.0.4 has beenmodified to note that its provisions shall not prevent passage throughor to operational modes as required to comply with ACTION requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the changes intended to achieve consistency with the Westinghouse- Standard Technical Specifications (WSTS), Draft Revision 5, the intentof the Specifications will not be changed nor will operating limitationsof the Technical Specifications be changed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Therefore, use of the modified specification would not involve a significantreduction in the margin of safety. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the analysis provided by the licensee in supportof a proposed no significant hazards consideration determination. The staffagrees with the licensee's analysis and believes that the licensee hasmet the criteria for such a determination. Therefore, the staff proposesto determine that the proposed changes do not involve a significant hazardsconsideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Environmental and Urban AffairsLibrary, Florida International University, Miami, Florida 33199 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Harold F. Reis, Esquire, Newman and Holtzer,P.C., 1615 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20036 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Herbert N. Berkow <ITAG tagnum="84">Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal ElectricAuthority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket Nos. 50-321 and 50-366,Edwin I. Hatch Nuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Appling County, Georgia </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 2 and December 22, 1986, May31, August 8, and December 14, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>In accordance with the requirementsof 10 CFR 73.55, the licensees submitted an amendment to the Physical SecurityPlan for the Edwin I. Hatch Nuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, to reflect recentchanges to that regulation. The proposed amendments would modify paragraph2.C.(4) of Facility Operating License DPR-57 and paragraph 2.D. of FacilityOperating License NPF-5. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>On August 4, 1986 (51 FR 27817 and 27822), the Nuclear RegulatoryCommission amended Part 73 of its regulations, ``Physical Protection ofPlants and Materials,'' to clarify plant security requirements to affordan increased assurance of plant safety. The amended regulations requiredthat each nuclear power reactor licensee submit proposed amendments toits security plan to implement the revised provisions of 10 CFR 73.55.The licensee submitted its revised plan on December 2 and 22, 1986, May31, August 8, and December 14, 1988, to satisfy the requirements of theamended regulations. The Commission proposes to amend the licenses to referencethe revised plan. In the Supplementary Materials accompanying the amended regulations, theCommission indicated that it was amending its regulations ``to providea more safety conscious safeguards system while maintaining the currentlevels of protection'' and that the ``Commission believes that the clarificationand refinement of requirements as reflected in these amendments is appropriatebecause they afford an increased assurance of plant safety.'' The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application of thecriteria for determining whether a significant hazards consideration existsby providing certain examples of actions involving no significant hazardsconsiderations and examples of actions involving significant hazards considerations(51 FR 7750). One of these examples of actions involving no significanthazards considerations is example (vii) ``a change to conform a licenseto changes in the regulations, where the license change results in veryminor changes to facility operations clearly in keeping with the regulations.''The changes in this case fall within the scope of the example. For theforegoing reasons, the Commission proposes to determine that the proposedamendments involve no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Appling County Public Library,301 City Hall Drive, Baxley, Georgia 31513 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Bruce W. Churchill, Esquire, Shaw, Pittman,Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>David B. Matthews <ITAG tagnum="84">GPU Nuclear Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-289, Three Mile IslandNuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Dauphin County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 2, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>This amendment would removethe restriction that offsite licensee personnel be used to conduct annualfire protection inspections and audits. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>GPU Nuclear Corporation has determined that this Technical SpecificationChange Request poses no significant hazards as defined by NRC in 10 CFR50.92. <ITAG tagnum="21">1. Operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not involve a significant increase in the probability of occurrenceor consequences of an accident previously evaluated. This change is relatedto previously evaluated plant fire effects and the fire hazards analysisin that the change effects the composition of the annual audit team whichinspects plant fire protection equipment taken credit for in the fire hazardsanalysis. The proposed amendment removes the requirement that offsite personnelshall be used to perform the annual fire protection and loss preventionprogram inspection and audit. Based on existing procedural controls whichdefine the composition of the audit team, this change does not reduce thequality or effectiveness of the annual audit. The annual audit will continueto adequately assess plant fire protection equipment and program implementation.Therefore, the proposed amendment does not increase the probability ofoccurrence or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. The proposed amendment removesthe requirement that offsite personnel shall be used to perform the annualfire protection and loss prevention program inspection and audit, and isunrelated to the possibility of creating a new or different kind of accident.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposedamendment does not reduce the quality or effectiveness of the annual audit.Therefore, there is no reduction in a margin of safety. </ITAG>The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. Accordingly, theCommission proposes to determine that the proposed amendment involves nosignificant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Government Publications Section,State Library of Pennsylvania, Walnut Street and Commonwealth Avenue, Box1601, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17105. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Ernest L. Blake, Jr., Esquire, Shaw, Pittman,Potts andamp; Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">GPU Nuclear Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-289, Three Mile IslandNuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Dauphin County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 19, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>This amendment would revisethe reactor coolant temperature at which low temperature overpressure protectionis enabled. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>GPUN has determined that the Technical Specification Change Requestposes no significant hazards as defined by NRC in 10 CFR 50.92. <ITAG tagnum="21">1. Operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not involve a significant increase in the probability of occurrenceor consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposed amendmentraises the HPI pump breaker rack out temperature from 275anddegrees; F and320anddegrees; F to 332anddegrees; F. The design basis accident related toHigh Pressure Injection (HPI) operability is a LOCA when the reactor iscritical. Technical Specification Section 3.1.3 requires that reactor coolantsystem temperature be above 525anddegrees; F before the reactor is made critical.Therefore, raising the HPI pump breaker rack out or makeup valve closuretemperature from 320anddegrees; F to 332anddegrees; F is unrelated to increasingthe probability of occurrence or the consequences of an accident previouslyevaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any previously evaluated. The rack out of HPI pump breakers or closureof makeup valves at 332anddegrees; F shifts the region in which HPI is notautomatically available from 320anddegrees; F to 332anddegrees; F. The existingTechnical Specification Section 3.1.3 requires that the Reactor CoolantSystem temperature be above 525anddegrees; F before the reactor is made critical.Therefore, raising the rackout temperature to 332anddegrees; F representsa slightly different initial condition for a transient without automaticHPI availability. Since HPI operability is not required below 525anddegrees;F, this change does not represent a different type of accident from thosepreviously considered. The proposed amendment provides additional protectionagainst reactor vessel overpressurization events and is unrelated to thepossibility of creating a new or different kind of accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposedamendment provides sufficient margin of safety for reactor vessel overpressurizationevents by preventing HPI initiation below 332anddegrees; F. The margin of1.0 on primary membrane stress is justified at these elevated operatingtemperatures on the basis of the low probability of occurrence of suchoverpressurization events and the large margin that exists between thematerial reference toughness used for the analysis and the material crackinitiation toughness values. HPI pump breaker rack out or makeup valveclosure at 332anddegrees; F instead of 320anddegrees; F does not reduce thesafety margins related to core cooling. A LOCA initiated at either temperaturewill not result in core uncovery when operator actions are taken in accordancewith plant abnormal transient procedures. Therefore, it is concluded thatoperation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment doesnot involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. </ITAG>The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. Accordingly, theCommission proposes to determine that the proposed amendment involves nosignificant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Government Publications Section,State Library of Pennsylvania, Walnut Street and Commonwealth Avenue, Box1601, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17105. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Ernest L. Blake, Jr., Esquire, Shaw, Pittman,Potts andamp; Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, Docket No. 50-245, Millstone NuclearPower Station, Unit No. 1, New London County, Connecticut </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 20, l989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>This amendment to the TechnicalSpecifications (TS) would (1) remove cycle-specific parameter limits fromSection 3/4.11 in response to Generic Letter 88-16, (2) decrease the MinimumCritical Power Ratio (MCPR) Safety Limit from 1.07 to 1.04 in accordancewith an approved generic safety analysis, and (3) remove approval to initiatereactor start-up with flow indication from 1 of the 20 jet pumps unavailable.The proposed amendment to remove cycle-specific parameter limits from theTS would replace those limits with a reference to a Supplemental ReloadLicensing Submittal (SRLS). In addition, the SRLS has been included inthe Definitions Section of the TS to note that it is the unit-specificdocument that provides these limits for the current operating reload cycle.Furthermore, the definition notes that the values of these parameter limitsare to be determined in accordance with specification 6.9.1.9. This specificationrequires that the Operating Limits be determined for each reload cyclein accordance with the referenced NRC-approved methodology and be consistentwith the applicable limits of the safety analysis. Finally, this reportand any mid-cycle revisions shall be provided to the NRC upon issuance.Generic Letter 88-16, dated October 4, 1988, provided guidance to licenseeson requests for removal of values of the cycle-specific parameter limitsfrom the TS. The licensee's proposed amendment is in response to this GenericLetter. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as defined in 10 CFR 50.92(c). The licensee has determined and the staff agrees that the proposed amendmentwill not: <ITAG tagnum="21">1. Involve a significant increase in the probability of an accidentpreviously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Generic Letter 88-16_This portion of the proposed change, whichremoves cycle-specific values of LHGR, MCPR, and APLHGR from the TechnicalSpecifications and includes them in the Supplemental Reload Licensing Submittal,has no impact on the consequences of any design basis event due to thefact that the change is administrative in nature. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. MCPR Safety Limit Change_The proposed change involves a modificationto the MCPR safety limit. For the limiting MCPR event there is no increasein consequences of any design basis event since the criterion of importance,99.9 percent of all rods do not experience boiling transition, is maintainedeven though the value of safety limit has been lowered by 0.03. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Inoperable Jet Pump Flow Instrumentation_This portion of the changeremoves approval to start up with Jet Pump ``K'' flow instrumentation inoperable.This change is conservative in nature, and makes Specification 3.6.G.2more restrictive. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany previously analyzed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed changes do not modify plant response to any operationalor accident event, nor do they create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Generic Letter 88-16_This portion of the change modifies TechnicalSpecification wording without changing actual operational limits, and thereforedoes not impact the margin of safety as defined in the Bases of any TechnicalSpecification. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. MCPR Safety Limit Change_The MCPR safety limit and LCO are setto protect the fuel cladding from undergoing boiling transition followingany design basis transient of moderate frequency. The protective boundary(fuel cladding) is maintained, as is the margin of safety, as long as 99.9percent of all rods do not experience boiling transition following anydesign basis transient. This criterion is met even though the safety limitis changed from 1.07 to 1.04. This change from a MCPR safety limit of 1.07to 1.04, as a result of a calculational refinement, was generically approvedby NRC letter dated December 27, 1987. Thus there is no negative impacton the margin of safety as defined in the Bases of any Technical Specification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Inoperable Jet Pump Flow Instrumentation_This portion of the changeremoves administrative approval to start up with jet pump flow instrumentationinoperable. As such, it does not impact the margin of safety. </ITAG>The proposed revision to the License Condition is in accordance with theguidance provided in Generic Letter 88-16 for licensees requesting removalof the values of cycle-specific parameter limits from TS. The establishmentof these limits in accordance to an NRC-approved methodology and the incorporationof these limits into the [Core] Operating Limits Reports will ensure thatproper steps have been taken to establish the values of these limits. Furthermore,the submittal of the [Core] Operating Limits Report will allow the staffto continue to trend the values of these limits without the need for priorstaff approval of these limits and without introduction of an unreviewedsafety question. Accordingly, the staff has made a determination that the application foramendment involves no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Waterford Public Library,49 Rope Ferry Road, Waterford, Connecticut 06385. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry andamp;Howard, Counselors at Law, City Place, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499.<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-423, MillstoneNuclear Power Station, Unit No. 3, New London County, Connecticut </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 24, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldchange the Millstone Unit 3 Technical Specifications (TS) to allow Cycle3 operation as follows: (1) TS 3/4.2.2 ``Heat Flux Hot Channel Factor - Four Loops Operating andThree Loops Operating'' would be changed to eliminate the reference tofuel assembly grid locations, (2) TS 5.3.1., ``Fuel Assemblies'' wouldbe changed to properly describe the Cycle 3 fuel assemblies, (3) TS 5.3.2,``Control Rod Assemblies'' would be changed to allow use of silver-indium-cadmiumcontrol rods and (4) TS 6.9.1.6, ``Radial Peaking Factor Limit Report''would be changed to allow submittal of the report prior to each cycle'sinitial criticality. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The fuel assemblies to be utilized for Cycle 3 operation (VantageV - Hybred) incorporate several refinements compared to the fuel assembliescurrently in use at Millstone Unit 3. The new fuel assemblies are reconstitutableto meet cycle-specific requirements. In addition, an improved, debris-resistent,lower nozzle and slightly lengthened assembly results in the fuel assemblygrids being offset by less than \1/2\&quot; compared to the existing fuel assemblies.Higher initial enrichment would be utilized. A second refinement for Cycle3 would allow the use of silver-indium-cadmium control rods. With regard to fuel assembly grids, TS 3/4.2.2 allows the licensee to exemptthe measured values of the planar radial peaking factor (F<T2>xy</T2>) when measured at the specified elevations where the gridsare located. This is due to the effects of the grids which make the fluxmeasurement inaccurate. Since the new fuel assemblies will have slightlyoff-set grid locations, the existing TS is not applicable. The licenseehas proposed that the specific grid elevations in TS 4.2.2.1.2f.3 and 4.2.2.2.2f.3be eliminated and replaced with a more general requirement that up to 20%of the core height, between 5% and 85% core height, can be eliminated fromF<T2>xy</T2> measurement. As indicated in the licensee's January 4, 1989 application, ``The proposedchange to delete specific grid plane centerlines will not affect the totalpercent of the core monitored for F<T2>xy</T2>. The previous requirement to monitor the core between 15% and85% of core height except within 272% of grid centerlines is essentiallyequal to the new requirement. There are 5 grids in the region to be monitoredwhich amounts to 20% being excluded due to the effect of the grids andanother 30% excluded at the top and bottom of the core. The total excludedarea with the new requirement is also 20% due to grids and 30% at the topand bottom of the core.'' We concur with this assessment. The licensee has also proposed changes to Section 5 of the TS. Changesto TS 5.3.1 and 5.3.2 describe the Cycle 3 fuel assemblies and the useof silver-indium-cadmium control rods, respectively. While the proposedchanges to TS 5.3.1 and 5.3.2 would permit the subject modifications tobe used, any impact on reactor operation due to revised safety analysisresults would be reflected in changes to the Limiting Conditions for Operationand/or the Surveillance Requirements; no such changes have been proposedfor Cycle 3. The changes described in proposed TS 5.3.1 and 5.3.2 representrefinements, rather than substantial changes, whose efficacy has been previouslydemonstrated in other operating facilities. Finally, the licensee has proposed a change to TS 6.9.1.6 to allow submittalof the Radial Peaking Factor Limit Report prior to initial-cycle criticalityrather than 60 days prior to the time that the applicable limits becomeeffective. The proposed change would allow the completion of cycle-specificcalculations during the refueling outage when changes in core configuration,due to discovery of fuel leakage, may result. On March 6, 1988, the NRC published guidance in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>(51 FR 7751) concerning examples of amendmentsthat are not likely to involve a significant hazards consideration. Oneexample of amendments not likely to involve significant hazards considerationsis example (iii) which involves, ``For a nuclear power reactor, a changeresulting from a nuclear reactor core reloading, if no fuel assembliessignificantly different from those found previously acceptable to the NRCfor a previous core at the facility in question are involved. This assumesthat no significant changes are made to the acceptance criteria for thetechnical specifications, that the analytical methods used to demonstrateconformance with the technical specifications and regulations are not significantlychanged, and that NRC has previously found such methods acceptable.'' Theproposed changes to the TS are within the scope of example (iii). Accordingly, the staff has made a proposed determination that the applicationfor amendment involves no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Waterford Public Library,49 Rope Ferry Road, Waterford, Connecticut 06385. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry andamp;Howard, One Constitution Plaza, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Omaha Public Power District, Docket No. 50-285, Fort Calhoun Station,Unit No. 1, Washington County, Nebraska </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 6, 1989. <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>This proposed amendment wouldrevise the Technical Specifications (TS) to (1) change the containmentspray system surveillance testing requirements to provide a quantitativevalue to define the minimum acceptance criteria, (2) change the Basis ofthe Containment spray system surveillance requirements by providing theminimum spray flow requirements determined from analysis, (3) reduce themaximum power level permitted on Figure 2-7, Limiting Condition for Operationfor Departure from Nucleate Boiling (DNB) Monitoring, (4) correct the neutronfluence value stated to occur at 14 Effective Full Power Years (EFPY) atthe inner surface of the reactor vessel wall at the critical weld locationfrom 1.4 x 1019 n/cm2 to 1.21 x 1019 n/cm2, (5) revise Figure 2-3, PredictedRation Induced NDTT Shift, based on calculations using Regulatory Guide1.99, Revision 2, and (6) change the references in TS 3.6 from ``FSAR''to ``USAR'' and add an additional reference of USAR Section 14.16. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityof consequences of an accident previously evaluated; (2) create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licenseeaddressed the above three standards in the amendment application. (1) Change the containment spray system surveillance testing requirements.With regard to the three standards, the licensee states that operationof the facility in accordance with this amendment would not: <ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Involve a significant increase in the operability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. This change establishes the acceptancecriteria, based on Combustion Engineering's Analysis ``Reexamination ofContainment Pressure Response for the DBA LOCA and DBA MSLB Events at FortCalhoun Station'' dated December 1988, which defines the operational requirementsfor the containment spray system which are necessary to prevent or mitigatethe Containment Pressure from exceeding 60 psig. No new accidents are creatednor are the consequences of any existing accidents increased by this change.Therefore, this change does not increase the probability or consequencesof a previously evaluated accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. The change defines the acceptancecriteria, based on Combustion Engineering's analysis ``Reexamination ofContainment Pressure Response for the DBA LOCA and DBA MSLB Events at FortCalhoun Station'' dated December 1988. It has been determined that a newor different kind of accident is not created because no new or differentmodes of operation are proposed for the plant. The continued use of thesame Technical Specification administrative controls prevents the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Administrativespecifications involving a change to the basis of the Technical Specificationensure that the operability requirements of the containment spray system,3155 gpm, are defined and, therefore, will not reduce the margin of safety.</ITAG>(2) Change to the Basis of the Containment Spray System Surveillance Requirements.With regard to the three standards, the licensee states that operationof the facility in accordance with this amendment would not: <ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Involve a significant increase in the operability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. This change establishes the acceptancecriteria, based on Combustion Engineering's Analysis ``Reexamination ofContainment Pressure Response for the DBA LOCA and DBA MSLB Events at FortCalhoun Station'' dated December 1988, which defines the operational requirementsfor the containment spray system which are necessary to prevent or mitigatethe Containment Pressure from exceeding 60 psig. No new accidents are creatednor are the consequences of any existing accidents increased by this change.Therefore, this change does not increase the probability or consequencesof a previously evaluated accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. The change defines the acceptancecriteria, based on Combustion Engineering's analysis ``Reexamination ofContainment Pressure Response for the DBA LOCA and DBA MSLB Events at FortCalhoun Station'' dated December 1988. It has been determined that a newor different kind of accident is not created because no new or differentmodes of operation are proposed for the plant. The continued use of thesame Technical Specification administrative controls prevents the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Administrativespecifications involving a change to the basis of the Technical Specificationensure that the operability requirements of the containment spray system,3155 gpm, are defined and, therefore, will not reduce the margin of safety.</ITAG>(3) Reduce the maximum power level permitted on Figure 2-7. With regardto the three standards, the licensee states that operation of the facilityin accordance with this amendment would not: <ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Involve significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The decrease in allowable power levelis a conservative change. The reduction would eliminate the possibilityof exceeding the power level allowed by other portions of the TechnicalSpecifications. No new accidents are created nor are the consequences ofany existing accident increased by the administrative change. Therefore,this change does not increase the probability or consequences of a previouslyevaluated accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. It has been determined that a newor different kind of accident is not created because no new or differentmodes of operation are proposed for the plant. The continued use of thesame Technical Specification administrative controls prevents the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. Administrativechanges involving a change in the maximum power level allowed to ensureconsistency with other sections of the Technical Specifications will notreduce the margin of safety. </ITAG>(4) Correct the neutron fluence value stated to occur at 14 EFPY. Withregard to the three standards, the licensee stated that operation of thefacility in accordance with this amendment would not: <ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequenceof an accident previously evaluated. This change merely changes the valueof the fluence to correctly correspond to the applicability date of theTechnical Specification Heatup and Cooldown curves. This change has noimpact on any consequences or accidents previously analyzed and, therefore,does not increase the probability or consequence of a previously evaluatedaccident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. It has been determined that a newor different type of accident is not created because no new or differentmodes of operation are proposed for the plant. The continued use of thesame Technical Specification administrative controls prevents the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. This changeis only updating the value of the fluence to correctly correspond to 14EFPY. Therefore, this change will not cause any reduction in the marginof safety. </ITAG>(5) Revise Figure 2-3, Predicted Radiation Induced NDTT Shift. With regardto the three standards, the licensee states that operation of the facilityin accordance with this amendment would not: <ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequenceof an accident previously evaluated. This change merely updated Figure2-3 to be in accordance with the current Regulatory Guide 1.99, Revision2, as required by Generic Letter 88-11. This figure has no impact on anyaccident previously analyzed and, therefore, will not increase the probabilityor consequence of an accident previously analyzed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. It has been determined that a newor different type of accident is not created because no new or differentmodes of operation are proposed for the plant. The continued use of thesame Technical Specification administrative controls prevents the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Figure2-3 only shows the shift in RT<T2>NDT</T2> over vessel life and this shift is used to adjust the Heatupand Cooldown curves so that the same margin of safety is always maintained.Therefore, this change will not reduce the margin of safety. </ITAG>(6) Change the references in TS 3.6 from ``FSAR'' to ``USAR'' and addingan additional reference of USAR Section 14.15. With regard to the threestandards, the licensee states that operation of the facility in accordancewith this amendment would not: <ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. This change merely allows the TechnicalSpecifications to reference the proper updated document with no changesin administrative specifications. Therefore, this change does not increasethe probability or consequence of a previously evaluated accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. It has been determined that a newor different kind of accident is not created because no new or differentmodes of operation are proposed for the plant. The continued use of thesame Technical Specification administrative controls prevents the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Administrativespecifications involving the referencing of the USAR will not reduce themargin of safety. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the analysis. Accordingly, the staff proposesto determine that the proposed changes to the Technical Specificationsdo not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>W. Dale Clark Library, 215South 15th Street, Omaha, Nebraska 68102 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>LeBoeuf, Lamb, Leiby, and MacRae, 1333New Hampshire Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20036 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Jose A. Calvo <ITAG tagnum="84">Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-275 and 50-323, DiabloCanyon Power Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, San Luis Obispo County, California</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>November 29, 1988 (Reference LAR 88-08)<T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise the combined Technical Specifications (TS) for the Diablo CanyonPower Plant (DCPP) Unit Nos. 1 and 2 to permit core reload and operationwith Westinghouse 17x17 VANTAGE 5 fuel assemblies. Both units are presentlyoperating with Westinghouse 17x17 low-parasitic (LOPAR) fuel assemblies.The transition from a complete LOPAR core to a complete VANTAGE 5 corewill be accomplished over three cycles in each unit. The proposed revisionsto the Technical Specifications support operation with each of the transitioncores and all subsequent cores using only VANTAGE 5 fuel. Design features of the VANTAGE 5 fuel include integral fuel burnable absorbers,intermediate flow mixers, reconstitutible top nozzles, axial blankets,optimized fuel rod diameter, and extended burnup capability. Changes tothe Technical Specifications are required due to the use of VANTAGE 5 fueland use of the following analytical methods and assumptions: (1) The Improved Thermal Design Procedure (2) The WRB-1 and WRB-2 departure from nucleate boiling (DNB) correlations;(3) Large break loss-of-coolant accident (LOCA) analyses using the 1981evaluation model and the BASH model; (4) Small break LOCA analyses using the NOTRUMP model; and (5) F<T2>Q</T2>(z) surveillance. As a result of the above, changes to the following Technical Specificationsare proposed: (1) Core Safety Limits (TS 2.1.1, Figures 2.2-1a and 2.2-1b); (2) Reactor Coolant Flow Trip Setpoint and Allowable Values (TS 2.2.1,Table 2.2-1); (3) Overtemperature delta T and Overpower delta T Reactor Trip Setpoints(TS 2.2.1, Table 2.2-1); (4) DNB Correlations, DNBR Limits, Power Range Neutron Flux High Rate,and F delta H Limit Uncertainties (Bases 2.1.1); (5) Rod Drop Time (TS 3.1.3.4); (6) Axial Flux Difference (TS 3/4.2.1); (7) Heat Flux Hot Channel Factor - F<T2>Q</T2>(Z) (TS 3/4.2.2, Bases 3/4.2.2); (8) Reactor Coolant System Flow Rate and Nuclear Enthalpy Rise Hot ChannelFactor (TS 3/4.2.3, Figures 3.2-3a and 3.2-3c); (9) DNB Parameters (TS 3/4.2.5, Table 3.2-1, Bases 3/4.2.5); (10) Engineered Safety Features Actuation System Instrumentation Trip Setpoints(TS 3/4.3.2, Table 3.3-4); (11) Group Height, Insertion, and Power Distribution Limits (TS 3/4.10.2);and (12) Radial Peaking Factor Limit Report (TS 6.9.1.8). <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a e.g.,no significant hazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c).A proposed amendment to an operating license for a facility involves nosignificant hazards consideration if operation of the facility in accordancewith the proposed amendment would not: (1) involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated;or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. The licensee, in its submittal of November 29, 1988, evaluated the proposedchanges against the significant hazards criteria of 10 CFR 50.92 and againstthe Commission guidance concerning application of this standard. Basedon the evaluation given below, the licensee has concluded that the proposedchanges do not involve a significant hazards consideration. The licensee'sevaluation is as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21">a. Does the change involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The VANTAGE 5 fuel assemblies are mechanically and hydraulically compatiblewith the current LOPAR fuel assemblies, control rods, and reactor internalsinterfaces. Also, implementation of VANTAGE 5 fuel does not cause a significantchange in the physics characteristics of the DCPP Units 1 and 2 cores beyondthe normal range of variation seen from cycle to cycle. The proposed changeshave been assessed from a core design and safety analysis standpoint. Noincrease in the probability of occurrence of any accident was identified.Extensive reanalyses were undertaken to demonstrate compliance with therevised DCPP Technical Specifications. The methods used to perform theanalyses have been previously approved by the NRC. The results, which includetransition core effects, show changes in consequences of accidents previouslyevaluated. However, the results are all clearly within NRC acceptance criteriaand demonstrate the plant's capability to operate safely. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Seismic and LOCA structural integrity analyses were performed forhomogeneous and transition cores of VANTAGE 5 fuel. The use of VANTAGE5 fuel does not affect the probability of a seismic or LOCA event. Fora homogeneous core of VANTAGE 5 fuel, the combined forces of a seismicand LOCA event do not result in grid deformation and the peak claddingtemperature (PCT) is less than the 10 CFR 50.46 limit. Limited grid deformationis predicted in the peripheral fuel assemblies for the limiting combinedloads from LOCA and seismic forces in transition cores. A coolable geometryanalysis was performed and the PCT limit was met. For transition cores,the analyses show changes in the consequences of accidents previously evaluated.However, the results are all clearly within NRC acceptance criteria. Thespent fuel pool high density racks were evaluated for storage of VANTAGE5 fuel. The evaluation determined that the storage of VANTAGE 5 fuel doesnot affect the conclusions in PGandamp;E'S LAR 85-13 (DCL-85-333, dated October30, 1985) and all supporting documentation regarding reracking of the spentfuel pools at Diablo Canyon Units 1 and 2. The radiological consequencesof previously analyzed accidents were reviewed for transition to VANTAGE5 fuel. All offsite doses remain less than 10 CFR 100 values. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Therefore, the proposed amendment does not result in an increase inthe probabilities or consequences of a previously evaluated accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. Does the change create the possibility of a new or different kindof accident from any accident previously evaluated? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed changes do not significantly affect the overall methodand manner of DCPP operation and can be accommodated without compromisingthe performance or qualification of safety-related equipment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Therefore, the proposed changes do not create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Does the change involve a significant reduction in the margin ofsafety? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The evaluations and analyses to support the Technical Specificationchanges and operation of DCPP Units 1 and 2 with VANTAGE 5 fuel show somechanges in the consequences of previously analyzed accidents. In some cases,an increase in event consequences occurs. However, in all cases the resultsof the changes are clearly within all plant design and NRC safety acceptancecriteria. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Therefore, the proposed amendment does not significantly reduce themargin of safety. </ITAG>The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination. The staff has concluded that while the margins may be reducedand event consequences may be increased, these impacts are not significantbecause: (1) the core reload uses VANTAGE 5 fuel which is not significantlydifferent from previous cores at the Diablo Canyon Power Plant; (2) thechanges to the Technical Specifications result from the core reload andnot from any significant change made to the acceptance criteria for TechnicalSpecifications; and (3) the analytical methods used in the required reloadanalysis have been previously found acceptable by the NRC. Therefore, thestaff agrees with the conclusion of the licensee's determination. Accordingly,the Commission proposes to determine that these changes do not involvea significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>California Polytechnic StateUniversity Library, Government Documents and Maps Department, San LuisObispo, California 93407 <T3>Attorneys for licensee: </T3>Richard R. Locke, Esq., Pacific Gas andElectric Company, P.O. Box 7442, San Francisco, California 94120 and BruceNorton, Esq., c/o Pacific Gas and Electric Company, P.O. Box 7442, SanFrancisco, California 94120. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>George W. Knighton <ITAG tagnum="84">Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket No. 50-352, Limerick GeneratingStation, Unit 1, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>September 14, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldchange the Limerick Unit 1 Technical Specifications (TSs) to increase theminimum level of water that must be maintained in the spray pond. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>At the Limerick site, there is a large spray pond located just northof the two cooling towers on the hill above the plant. The spray pond isthe ultimate heat sink (UHS) for the plant. The spray pond serves the safety-relatedfunctions of providing cooling water, and acting as a heat sink for theEmergency Service Water (ESW) system and the Residual Heat Removal ServiceWater (RHRSW) system during accident conditions. The UHS is designed toprovide sufficient cooling water to the ESW and RHRSW systems, permittingsimultaneous safe shutdown and cooldown of both units, and maintainingthem in a safe shutdown condition. Further system description, design andoperation information can be found in the Limerick Generating Station FinalSafety Analysis Report (FSAR) Section 9.2.6. For two-unit operation, the minimum volume of water which must be maintainedin the spray pond is 28.92 x 106 gallons. Given the size and shape of thespray pond, this volume of water will be available if the water level ismaintained at 250andmin172;10&quot; (above mean sea level). The analysis supporting250andmin172;10&quot; is presented in FSAR Section 9.2.6 and demonstrates theability of the spray pond to provide a 30-day cooling supply below themaximum pond temperature limit without make-up or blowdown, consideringthe design basis heat input and meteorological conditions. The NRC approvalof the spray pond is set forth in SER Section 9.2.5 (NUREG 0991) and Supplements3 and 4. For one-unit operation, the TS limit was set to 250andmin172;0&quot;,a value lower than what is required for two-unit operation to avoid theunnecessary operating restrictions which may result from having to maintainan excess spray pond volume. Construction of Limerick Unit 2 is nearingcompletion. Once Unit 2 is operating, the minimum water level that mustbe maintained in the spray pond has to be increased to the level approvedfor two-unit operation. The change to the TSs proposed by the licenseeis to increase the minimum water level in the TSs from the present 250andmin172;0&quot;to 250andmin172;10&quot;. This change would not be required and thus, would notgo into effect until Limerick Unit 2 is issued an operating license. The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license involves no significant hazards consideration ifoperation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment wouldnot: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; (2) create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or(3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. In the application of September 14, 1988, the licensee has determined thatthe requested amendment does not involve a significant hazards considerationfor the following reasons: <ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The proposed change does not involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Raising the minimum level to 250andmin172;10&quot; is within the boundingconditions for the accident/design analysis referred to in FSAR section9.2.6 and accepted by the NRC in section 9.2.5 of the Safety EvaluationReport (SER) and Supplements 3 and 4 for the Limerick Generating Station.The requirement to provide a 30 day cooling supply for two unit operationwhile complying with all the design requirements of the Standard ReviewPlan (as discussed in SER Section 9.2.5 and Supplements 3 and 4) is providedby raising the minimum level to 250andmin172;10&quot;. The cooling supply is designedto accommodate: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">i) single unit LOCA and safe shutdown of the other unit, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">ii) safe shutdown of both units. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The design basis accident analyses described in FSAR Chapter 15 areunaffected; therefore there is no significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The proposed change does not change or create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">As discussed in criterion one, the requested change provides spraypond level requirements within the scope of the accepted FSAR analysis.Therefore, the proposed change does not create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The proposed change does not involve a significant reduction ina margin of safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change raises the minimum spray pond level to providea margin of safety consistent with that previously approved for two-unitoperation in Section 9.2.5 of the LGS SER and Supplements 3 and 4 and isdetailed in FSAR section 9.2.6. A spray pond level of 250andmin172;10&quot; willprovide a 30 day cooling supply for two unit operation while complyingwith the design requirements of the Standard Review Plan (as discussedin SER 9.2.5 and Supplements thereto). The current specification providesthe cooling supply for a single unit only. Design requirements are identicalfor the current Specification and the proposed Specification so that thereis no reduction in a margin of safety. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's submittal and significant hazardsanalysis and concurs with the licensee's determination as to whether theproposed amendment involves a significant hazards consideration. Therefore,the staff proposes to determine that the proposed amendment involves nosignificant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pottstown Public Library,500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Conner and Wetterhahn, 1747 PennsylvaniaAvenue, NW., Washington, DC 20006 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Walter R. Butler <ITAG tagnum="84">Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket No. 50-352, Limerick GeneratingStation, Unit 1, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 23, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise the Technical Specifications (TSs) to permit the use of filterswith an increased pore size when periodically testing the amount of particulatecontamination in the diesel generator fuel oil. The Limerick plant has eight emergency diesel generators (EDGs). Each EDGis provided with an independent fuel oil system. Each fuel oil system providesfuel oil to diesel engine fuel injectors and consists of a fuel oil storagetank, a fuel oil transfer pump, a day tank, an engine-driven fuel pump,a dc motor-driven auxiliary fuel pump, and associated piping, valves, strainers,filters and instrumentation. The fuel oil transfer pumps are equipped witha suction strainer to prevent the entrance of any large particles or debris.Any particulates passing through the fuel oil transfer pump would be trappedby the strainers and filters located between the fuel oil transfer pumpdischarge and the diesel engine. Basket strainers are located on the fueloil day tank supply piping and one on the suction of both the engine-drivenfuel oil pump and the dc motor-driven fuel oil pump. Line filters are locatedon the discharge of both of these pumps to provide fine filtration of thefuel oil immediately prior to admission to the injectors. The licensee proposes to revise the TSs to increase the pore size of thefilters (from 0.8 to 3.0 microns) which are used during the performanceof the surveillance test which determines the level of EDG fuel oil particulatecontamination. Testing for particulates in diesel-generator fuel oil isperformed as required by TS Surveillance Requirement section 4.8.1.1.2.This test utilizes the process described in ASTM D2276-78, ``Standard TestMethods for Particulate Contamination in Aviation Turbine Fuels''. Thebasis of this surveillance process is that when a known amount of fueloil is passed through a filter of known weight, particulates larger thanthe filter pore size will not pass through the filter. The filter is thendried and reweighed to determine the mass of the trapped particulates.The mass of particulates per unit volume of fuel oil is verified to bewithin the acceptance criteria of 10mg/liter. This proposed TS change doesnot involve a change to the 10mg/liter limit; it only will change the filterpore size. The test does, however, provide an indication of fuel oil qualityby providing information on the quantity of particulates which are largerthan the test filter pore size that is present in the fuel oil. This testis only one of many surveillance tests which determine EDG fuel oil acceptabilityat Limerick. The current filter pore size used in the surveillance test, as specifiedin ASTM D2276-78, is 0.8 microns. The proposed TS change would increasethe filter pore size used during the surveillance test from 0.8 micronsto 3 microns. This proposed change would prevent the entrapment of particulatesin the size range of 0.8 to 3.0 microns during surveillance testing. Entrapmentof particulates in this size range is unnecessary as the in-line filters,which are the final step in the fuel oil filtration process before enteringthe engines, only trap particulates above 3-5 microns in diameter. The proposed change has been previously reviewed and approved by the NRCfor Peach Bottom Atomic Power Station Units 2 and 3 on May 31, 1988. (SeeAmendment Nos. 131 and 134 to Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-44 andDPR-56, Docket Nos. 50-277 and 50-278). <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsiderations if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated, (2) create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated,or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee addressed the above three standards in the amendment applicationas follows: <ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed change to the diesel fuel oil surveillance test doesnot involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change will not result in an increase in the quantityof particulates larger than 3.0 microns. The possible consequences of implementingthe proposed change could be an increase in the concentration of particulatesin the 0.8 to 3.0 micron size range. Although particulates smaller than3.0 microns will pass through the in-line fuel filtering system there willbe no adverse consequences on the operability of the EDGs. Accordingly,this change will not result in any increase in the probability of any accidentpreviously evaluated in Chapter 15, ``Safety Analysis'' of the LimerickGenerating Station FSAR. Therefore, the proposed increase in the test filterpore size does not involve a significant increase in the probability orconsequences of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The proposed change to the diesel fuel oil surveillance test doesnot create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change is limited to the test filter pore size for determiningthe level of particulate contamination of the EDG fuel oil. This changewill not affect the operability of the EDGs. The presence of particulatesbelow the size of 3.0 microns are of no consequence in the operation ofthe EDG as confirmed by the EDG manufacturer. Since the proposed changeonly affects the concentration of particulates in the 0.8 to 3.0 micronsize range, the proposed increase in the test filter pore size does notcreate the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The proposed change to the diesel fuel oil surveillance test doesnot involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change does not result in an increased concentrationof particulates larger than 3.0 microns. The only particulate sizes whichcan be affected by this proposed change are those smaller than 3.0 microns.These size particulates will pass through the in-line filters but willnot affect EDG operability; therefore, there is no significant reductionin the margin of safety. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's submittal and significant hazardsanalysis and concurs with the licensee's determination as to whether theproposed amendment involves a significant hazards consideration. Therefore,the staff proposes to determine that the proposed amendment involves nosignificant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pottstown Public Library,500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Conner and Wetterhahn, 1747 PennsylvaniaAvenue, NW., Washington, DC 20006 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Walter R. Butler <ITAG tagnum="84">Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket No. 50-352, Limerick GeneratingStation, Unit 1, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 27, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The submittal requests changesto the Technical Specifications (TSs) to accommodate the second refuelingof the reactor with new, previously irradiated and reconstituted fuel bundles.Limerick Unit 1 shutdown on January 11, 1989 for the second refueling outage.Starting in late March 1988, the facility experienced an increasing numberof fuel failures which caused gradual power reductions to limit offgasreleases. At the time of shutdown, the plant was operating at 41 percentrated power. The number of failed fuel rods will not be known until thefuel is inspected and sipped. Prior to the fuel failures, the licenseehad planned to replace 224 of the original cycle 1 fuel assemblies forcycle 3 operation, compared to the 268 fuel assemblies that were replacedduring the first reload in the summer of 1987. All of these new fuel assembliescontain four rather than two water rods. Because of the fuel failures andto reduce the potential for failures in the next cycle, the licensee isgoing to load 40 new, lower enriched (1.63 percent) fuel assemblies fromLimerick 2 in the interior of the core. The licensee is also planning tofully reconstitute 84 of the initial bundles that were removed during thefirst refueling, replacing all non-heat treated pins with heat treatedpins from donor bundles after verifying the heat treated pins via visualinspections. The licensee is also planning to reinsert 148 fuel assembliesthat were removed during the first refueling and are now in the spent fuelpool. These have been inspected for oxide deposition and will be locatedtoward the edge of the core. All of the irradiated fuel will have beenvisually inspected for oxide deposition and have been sipped to detectfailed fuel pins prior to use in cycle 3. None of the initial cycle 1 fuelassemblies that are presently in the core will be used in cycle 3. To accountfor the above arrangement, the licensee has submitted a bounding reloadanalysis for cycle 3. The proposed changes to the TSs being requested areto specify the operating limits for all fuel types discussed above forCycle 3 operation. Other changes to the TSs proposed by the licensee arerevisions to permit use of hybrid hafnium control blade assemblies. InAmendment No. 7 to the Limerick Unit 1 license approving the first reload,the rod block monitor (RBM) setpoint was increased from 106 to 107 percent.The licensee proposes in this reload application to reduce the RBM setpointback to 106 percent to reduce the delta critical power ratio associatedwith a postulated rod withdrawal error. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license involves no significant hazards consideration ifoperation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment wouldnot: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; (2) create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or(3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed changes to the TSs consist of five items as discussed above(identified as A through E below). In their January 27, 1989 letter, thelicensee provided a separate analysis and discussion of each item as followssupporting a finding of no significant hazards consideration determination:<ITAG tagnum="21">A. New Fuel MAPLHGRs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">i) The proposed change does not involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10CFR50.46 establishes acceptance criteria for fuel and EmergencyCore Cooling Systems (ECCS). MAPLHGR limits are established to ensure thatthe acceptance criteria are met. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This change provides MAPLHGR limits for the BC318A and BC322A (GE8x8EB)fuel assemblies. The MAPLHGRs have been calculated using NRC approved methods,and the results of the analysis (General Electric Company Document NEDE-31401-P)demonstrate that the acceptance criteria of 10CFR50.46 are met with substantialmargin. This change, therefore, does not increase the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated (i.e. Loss of Coolant Accident, LOCA).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">ii) The proposed change does not create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Because MAPLHGR limits can not initiate an accident, and imposingthe limits does not require any changes to the current mode of operation,this change does not create the possibility of a new or different kindof accident than previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">iii) The proposed change does not involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The acceptance criteria of 10CFR50.46 establish the margins of safetyfor fuel and the ECCS. Calculations using NRC approved methods yield resultswell within these acceptance criteria. The maximum Peak Cladding Temperature(PCT) for the BC318A and BC322A fuel assemblies is 2074 degrees F, providing126 degrees F margin to the 2200 degrees F limit. The maximum PCT in previouscycles was 2090 degrees F for BP8x8R fuel providing a margin of 110 degreesF to the 2200 degrees F limit. Therefore, the proposed change does notresult in a reduction in the margin of safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. Reconstituted Fuel MAPLHGRs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">i) The proposed change does not involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10CFR50.46 establishes acceptance criteria for fuel and ECCS. MAPLHGRlimits are established to ensure that the acceptance criteria are met.This change provides MAPLHGR limits for the BPCRB248A (BP8x8R) fuel assembly.This fuel assembly is a reconstituted initial core fuel assembly in whichup to four original irradiated gadolinia fuel rods are replaced with freshnatural uranium fuel rods. Natural uranium fuel rods are a normal, approvedcomponent of BP8x8R fuel assemblies. Bounding MAPLHGRs for this fuel assembly,assuming all four gadolinia fuel rods are replaced with natural uraniumfuel rods, have been calculated using NRC approved methods, and the resultsof the analysis (General Electric Company Document NEDE-31401-P) demonstratethat the acceptance criteria of 10CFR50.46 are met with substantial margin.This change, therefore, does not increase the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated (i.e., LOCA). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">ii) The proposed change does not create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Reconstitution of this fuel assembly results in an additional variantof the BP8x8R fuel type which requires a new analysis to determine MAPLHGRlimits. Because MAPLHGR limits can not initiate an accident, and imposingthe limits does not require any changes to the current mode of operation,this change does not create the possibility of a new or different kindof accident than previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">iii) The proposed changes do not involve a significant reduction ina margin of safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The acceptance criteria of 10CFR50.46 establish the margins of safetyfor fuel and the ECCS. Calculations using the NRC approved methods yieldresults well within these acceptance criteria. The maximum PCT of the originalfuel assembly is 2090 degrees F, providing 110 degrees F margin to the2200 degrees F limit. Reconstitution of the fuel assembly results in amaximum PCT less than 2090 degrees F. Therefore, the proposed change doesnot result in a reduction in the margin of safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. New Operating Limit MCPRs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">i) The proposed change does not involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The operating limit MCPR is set such that the safety limit MCPR cannotbe violated in the unlikely event of an Anticipated Operational Occurrence(AOO). The operating limit MCPR is determined by adding the delta-CPR forthe worst AOO to the safety limit MCPR. The AOO delta-CPR is calculatedusing NRC approved methods described in General Electric Document NEDE-24011-P-A-9.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The limiting AOOs have been re-evaluated in detail for standard conditions:generator load rejection with bypass failure, inadvertent High PressureCoolant Injection (HPCI) activation, and feedwater controller failure.The limiting AOO, feedwater controller failure, was re-evaluated in detailfor operation in the Extended Load Line Limit analysis region, and foroperation at Increased Core Flow with or without Final Feedwater TemperatureReduction. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Cycle 3 operating limits are based on the results given in GeneralElectric Document No. 23A5926. Operation above these limits means thatno fuel damage is calculated to occur in the event of an AOO. Since theCycle 3 operating limits accomplish the same purpose as the previous limits,this change does not increase the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">ii) The proposed change does not create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The operating limit MCPR is not the initiating event of any accidentand it does not require a change in the current mode of operation, so thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident than previously evaluatedis not created. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">iii) The proposed change does not involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The operating limit MCPR is set to prevent calculated fuel damageduring the worst AOO. The delta-CPR for the worst AOO is determined usingNRC approved methods and procedures described in General Electric DocumentNEDE-24011-P-A-9. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Margin is included in the delta-CPR for the worst AOO by assumingconservative input parameters and by conservatively treating uncertainties.Margin is also included in the determination of the safety limit MCPR.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Changing the operating limit MCPR does not reduce the margin of safetyincluded in the delta-CPR and safety limit MCPR calculations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. Change In RBM Setpoint </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">i) The proposed change does not involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The purpose of the Rod Block Monitor (RBM) is to prevent withdrawalof a control rod to the point where fuel damage is expected to occur. Evaluationshave been performed using NRC approved procedures and methods (GeneralElectric Document NEDE-24011-P-9) to demonstrate the adequacy of the RBMsetpoint. The results of this evaluation are provided in General ElectricDocument No. 23A5926. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The delta-CPR associated with withdrawing the maximum reactivity controlrod during a Rod Withdrawal Error, to various RBM setpoints is determined.The MCPR limit for this event is determined by adding the delta-CPR atthe setpoint of interest (106%) to the safety limit MCPR. Operation ofthe plant above the MCPR limit means that, in the unlikely event of a rodwithdrawal to its maximum allowed by the RBM setpoint, fuel damage willnot be calculated to occur. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The operating limits for Cycle 3 (justified in General Electric DocumentNo. 23A5926) preclude the possibility of calculated fuel damage duringall AOOs, including Rod Withdrawal Error with a RBM setpoint of 106%. Therefore,this change does not increase the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">ii) The proposed change does not create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Adjusting the RBM setpoint impacts only the Rod Withdrawal Error,which is analyzed in General Electric Document No. 23A5926, so the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident is not created. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">iii) The proposed change does not involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The delta-CPR for rod withdrawal to the RBM setpoint of 106% is calculatedusing NRC approved procedures and methods (General Electric Document NEDE-24011-P-A-9).Margin is included in the delta-CPR by the conservative manner in whichit is calculated. Margin is also included in the determination of the safetylimit MCPR. Changing the RBM setpoint does not reduce the margin of safetyincluded in these calculations. The Rod Withdrawal Error AOO is boundedby the feedwater controller failure as shown in General Electric DocumentNo. 23A5926. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. Design Features </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">i) The proposed change does not involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This administrative change is proposed to permit the use of new, improvedfuel assemblies and control blade assemblies. These fuel assemblies andcontrol blade assemblies have been previously approved by the NRC. Therefore,this change does not increase the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">ii) The proposed change does not create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This change permits use of fuel assemblies and control blade assembliesthat have been previously approved as direct replacements for originalequipment. Therefore, the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentis not created. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">ii) The proposed change does not involve a significant reduction ina margin of safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Since this change permits use of fuel assemblies and control bladeassemblies that have been approved as direct replacements for previouslyinstalled fuel and control blade assemblies, it will not involve a significantreduction in a margin of safety. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's submittal and significant hazardsanalysis and concurs with the licensee's determination as to whether theproposed amendment involves a significant hazards consideration. Therefore,the staff proposes to determine that the proposed amendment involves nosignificant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pottstown Public Library,500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Conner and Wetterhahn, 1747 PennsylvaniaAvenue, NW., Washington, DC 20006 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Walter R. Butler <ITAG tagnum="84">Public Service Company of Colorado, Docket No. 50-267, Fort St. VrainNuclear Generating Station, Weld County, Colorado </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>January 13, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>This amendment request resultsfrom the licensee's need to have a 500 curie source of cesium-137 on siteto perform calibration of a high range detection instrumentation. Amendment41 to the Fort St. Vrain Technical Specifications directed Public ServiceCompany of Colorado to, at a future time, replace the listing of specificisotopes with a statement similar to that now requested in 2.c. The currentRadiological control Program maintains adequate control of the use andstorage of calibration sources. This will serve to place the Fort St. VrainLicense in a format more similar to the recently issued Licenses. Thisamendment request supersedes the request dated September 23, 1988 and noticedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on November 16, 1988 at 53 FR 46154. The changesreflect a letter from the NRC to the licensee dated November 18, 1988.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee provided an analysis that addressed the above three standardsin the amendment application as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21">1. involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The use of sources for calibrationpurposes does not effect the design or function of any plant system/component.The updating of this license condition to not specify individual isotopeswill allow more flexibility, and is being done based on an NRC recommendation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated. The calibration of detection instrumentationdoes not create the possibility of any accident different from those alreadyanalyzed. Non-specific designation of the calibration sources will notcreate any new failure modes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The currentradiological control program provides adequate control over the use andstorage of calibration sources, as stated in the Safety Evaluation by theNuclear Regulatory Commission related to Amendment No. 41 to Facility OperatingLicense DPR-34. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination. Based on the review and the above discussions, the staffproposes to determine that the proposed changes do not involve significanthazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Greeley Public Library, CityComplex Building, Greeley, Colorado <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>J. K. Tarpey, Public Service Company Building,Room 900, 550 15th Street, Denver, Colorado 80202 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Jose A. Calvo <ITAG tagnum="84">Public Service Electric andamp; Gas Company, Docket Nos. 50-272 and50-311, Salem Generating Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Salem County, NewJersey </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>October 29, 1987 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>These proposed amendments toSalem Unit 1 and Salem Unit 2 Technical Specifications will add ReactorVessel Level Instrumentation System (RVLIS) to Tables 3.3-11 and 4.3-11,and Table Notation pages associated with Specification 3.3.3.7, AccidentMonitoring Instrumentation. Also, Tables 3.3-11a and 3.3-11b in the SalemUnit 1 Technical Specifications have been combined into a single Table(3.3-11). The Total Number of Channels column has been omitted from Table3.3-11 in both Salem 1 and Salem 2 Technical Specifications. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>These proposed changes will add specifications for instrumentationdealing with inadequate core cooling. These specifications will provideassurance that the Reactor Vessel Level Instrumentation System (RVLIS)equipment installed at Salem 1 and Salem 2 is operated and maintained withinacceptable limits. These proposed changes are in response to NUREG-0737,Clarification of TMI Action Plan Requirements; guidance provided in GenericLetter 83-37, NUREG-0737 Technical Specifications; and an additional request,by letter from the NRC dated November 17, 1983, for Technical Specificationsfor Inadequate Core Cooling instrumentation. The RVLIS equipment has been installed on the Salem units in response toNUREG-0737. The Westinghouse designed system was approved by NRC and theinstallation of the system subjected to a 10 CFR 50.59 Safety Evaluation.The RVLIS is an informational system with no control functions performedby the system. RVLIS neither replaces nor couples with any existing safetysystem. The RVLIS adds to the information available to the control roomoperator during normal and post-accident conditions, thereby providingan additional measure of safety. The combining of the two tables in the Salem 1 Technical Specificationsand the deletion of the Total Number of Channels column from the Salem1 and Salem 2 Technical Specifications are administrative in that thereare no changes in any requirements. The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application of itsstandards set forth in 10 CFR 50.92 by providing certain examples (51 FR7751). One of the examples, (ii), of an amendment relates to ``A changethat constitutes an additional limitation, restriction, or control notpresently included in the technical specifications, e.g., a more stringentsurveillance requirement.'' The addition of RVLIS technical specificationsrelates to this example because it would impose limits on a new system.A second example (i) of an amendment relates to ``A purely administrativechange to technical specifications: for example, a change to achieve consistencythroughout the technical specifications, correction of an error, or a changein nomenclature.'' The combining of the two tables in the Salem Unit 1Technical Specifications and the deletion of the Total Number of Channelscolumn from the Salem 1 and Salem 2 Technical Specifications relate tothis example because there are no changes in any requirements. Based on the above discussion of the proposed changes, the staff proposesto determine that the requested amendments do not involve a significanthazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Salem Free Public library,112 West Broadway, Salem, New Jersey 08079 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mark J. Wetterhahn, Esquire, Conner andWetterhahn, Suite 1050, 1747 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20006<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Walter R. Butler <ITAG tagnum="84">Public Service Electric andamp; Gas Company, Docket Nos. 50-272 and50-311, Salem Generating Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Salem County, NewJersey </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>September 12, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldadd to the Salem Unit 1 and Salem Unit 2 Technical Specifications the requirementsfor the reactor vessel head vents as requested in Generic Letter 83-37and Item II.B.1 of NUREG-0737, ``Clarification of TMI Action Plan Requirements.''A Limiting Condition for Operation would be added to require at least onereactor vessel head vent path to be operable with the valves closed. AnAction Statement would be added that allows the vent path to be inoperablefor up to 30 days. Surveillance requirements are added that demonstratethe operability of the vent path every 18 months by verifying manual valvepositions, cycling the valves and verifying flow through the vent lines.The bases for the Reactor Vessel Head Vents are also added. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>This change was submitted to comply with Item II.B.1 of NUREG-0737,Clarification of TMI Action Plan Requirements; and Generic Letter 83-37,NUREG-0737 Technical Specifications, for the Reactor Vessel Head Vent Systemtechnical specifications. The specific plant design for the reactor vesselhead vents was previously reviewed and approved by the NRC. The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has analyzed the proposed amendment to determine if a significanthazards consideration exists: <ITAG tagnum="21">Operation of Reactor Vessel Head Vent System in accordance with theproposed Technical Specification change does not involve a significanthazards consideration. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. The probability of occurrence or the consequences of an accidentor malfunction of equipment important to safety previously evaluated inthe safety analysis report will not be significantly increased. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed change requires that a Reactor Vessel Head Vent pathbe operable with the valves shut when the reactor is in Mode 1-4. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A positive indication of the valve position is provided in the controlroom. The probability of the vent path failing to close, once opened, isminimized by design in circuitry that a single failure within the powerand control aspects will not prevent reclosure and isolation of the headvent system when required. Head vents are normally closed. Opening of theReactor Head Vents is expected only during accident response to vent non-condensiblefrom the RCS or venting the reactor during startup. The size of the ventis designed to vent a volume equal to one half the RCS volume in one hour.However, a flow restricting orifice limits the flow from a pipe ruptureor inadvertent opening to less than capability of the reactor coolant makeupsystem. Therefore, even if the vent path leaked or was opened at power,and no mitigating actions were taken, flow through the line would be withinthe normal capacity of the charging system. This will minimize the challengesto the emergency core cooling system (ECCS) since the leakage or inadvertentopening of the vent would not require ECCS actuation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Salem Technical Specifications do not currently address the operabilityof the Reactor Vessel Head Vent. Inclusion of this proposed amendment wouldimpose an additional limitation and more stringent requirements not presentlyincluded in the Technical Specifications with respect to the Reactor VesselHead Vents. This proposed change is comparable to the Technical Specificationwording suggested in Generic Letter No. 83-37. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The possibility of an accident or malfunction of a different typethan any evaluated previously in the safety analysis will not be created.This assessment was made by the Commission on a generic basis during theirconsideration of the requirements for reactor head vents. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Reactor Vessel Head Vent system conforms to the requirements ofAppendices A and B of 10CFR50. The system does not change plant operationto create a different type of accident. The head vent system will be remotelyoperable from the control room and will not aggravate the challenge tocontainment during the course of any accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. The margin of safety as defined in the basis for any TechnicalSpecification is not reduced. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This proposed change will both ensure the availability of the ReactorVessel Head Vents and maintain the capability to ensure reactor coolantpressure boundary integrity in the event of inoperability of PORVs. Anoperable Reactor Vessel Head Vent system allows for more effective mitigationof postulated accidents in which non-condensible gases might accumulatein the reactor vessel. The system is designed to ensure a low probabilityof inadvertent or irreversible actuation and a high probability of operatingwhen needed. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's submittal and significant hazardsanalysis and concurs with the licensee's determination that the proposedamendment does not involve a significant hazards consideration. Therefore,the staff proposes to determine that the proposed amendment involves nosignificant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Salem Free Public library,112 West Broadway, Salem, New Jersey 08079 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mark J. Wetterhahn, Esquire, Conner andWetterhahn, Suite 1050, 1747 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20006<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Walter R. Butler <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment requests: </T3>January 31, 1989 (TS 89-15) <T3>Description of amendment requests: </T3>The Tennessee Valley Authority(TVA) has proposed to modify Section 3.1.3, Movable Control Assemblies,of the Sequoyah, Units 1 and 2 Technical Specifications (TS). The proposedchanges would revise the limiting conditions for operation (LCO) 3.1.3.4and 3.1.3.5 and the Figure 3.1-1 to define the fully withdrawn conditionfor shutdown and control rod banks as a position within the interval ofequal to or greater than 222 steps withdrawn and of equal to or less than231 steps withdrawn. TVA also proposed adding a section in the Bases ofthe TS to define the fully withdrawn condition for shutdown and controlrod banks. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>TVA provided the following information on the proposed TS changesin its submittal: <ITAG tagnum="21">Fretting wear of reactor cluster control assembly (RCCA) rodlets becauseof flow-induced vibratory contact between the rodlets and guide blocksduring long periods of steady state operation has been identified as apotential problem for Westinghouse Electric Corporation pressurized waterreactor facilities. This problem was further identified by NRC in IE InformationNotice 87-19, which was issued on April 9, 1987. Westinghouse has recommendedthat RCCAs be axially repositioned to slightly change the position of fullywithdrawn RCCAs in order to distribute the wear. IE Information Notice87-19 indicates that several licensees have been given approval for axialrepositioning as a mitigation step for RCCS guide block wear. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Several reports have been received recently that indicate the needfor axial repositioning of RCCAs may be greater than previously anticipated.Two reports (non-U.S. plants) indicated that rodlet separation from RCCAhas been attributed to guide card wear. Some U.S. plants have reportedsevere wear, including clad perforation, after two or three cycles of operation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Changing the technical specifications to define the fully withdrawnposition of RCCAs will permit axial repositioning to mitigate guide blockwear. This action will improve RCCA reliability and extend the RCCS lifetime.</ITAG>The Commission has provided Standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). 10 CFR 50.91requires that at the time a licensee requests an amendment, it must provideto the Commission its analyses, using the standards in Section 50.92, onthe issue of no significant hazards consideration. Therefore, in accordancewith 10 CFR 50.91 and 10 CFR 50.92, the licensee has performed and providedthe following analysis: <ITAG tagnum="21">TVA has evaluated the proposed technical specification change andhas determined that it does not represent a significant hazards considerationbased on criteria established in 10 CFR 50.92(c). Operation of SQN in accordancewith the proposed amendment will not: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The RCCAs remain engaged in the topof the fuel assembly even if repositioned to the maximum allowed all rodsout (ARO) position (step 231). The initial RCCA position does not affectthe probability of any accident previously analyzed. The only adverse effectsbecause of repositioning are a slight reduction in shutdown margin andan increase in rod drop time. The assumptions used in the safety analysesare unaffected by the repositioning (i.e., the effects of repositioningare bound by the safety analyses). Therefore, the repositioning will notincrease the consequences of a previously evaluated accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any previously analyzed. The RCCAs are still engaged in the top ofthe fuel assemblies. Therefore, there are no new mechanisms for impairedrod movement. Repositioning creates no new possibilities of inadvertentpositive reactivity additions or insufficient negative reactivity insertions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Repositioninghas the potential to reduce control rod worth and increase control roddrop time. At an ARO position of 222 steps, the control rod worth is reducedby 0.12-percent delta rho. However, this penalty is accounted for in thetechnical specification shutdown margin requirements. At the ARO positionof 231 steps, there will be a slight increase in rod drop time (approximately0.03 second). This increase is small relative to the existing margin (approximately0.6 second) and would not impact the technical specification requirementof 2.2 seconds. Adequate shutdown margin and rod drop times are verified[in] each cycle of operation. Therefore, there are no reductions in margins[of] safety because of repositioning. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. Therefore, the staffproposes to determine that the application for amendments involves no significanthazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Chattanooga-Hamilton CountyLibrary, 1001 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority,400 West Summit Hill Drive, E11 B33, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902. <T3>NRC Assistant Director: </T3>Suzanne Black <ITAG tagnum="84">Virginia Electric and Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-280 and 50-281,Surry Power Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Surry County, Virginia </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>July 1, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldrevise Technical Specifications (TS) 3.1.D.3 and 3.1.D.4 as allowed byNRC Generic Letter 85-19, ``Reporting Requirements on Primary Coolant IodineSpikes.'' The Generic Letter states that licensees may eliminate the existingrequirement to shut down a plant if coolant iodine activity limits areexceeded for 800 hours in a 12-month period. No corresponding shutdownrequirement exists in the Surry Technical Specifications. However, TS 3.1.D.3currently requires that a Special Report be submitted if coolant iodineactivity limits are exceeded for 300 hours in a 6-month period. Becausethe Generic Letter also states that the reporting requirements for iodinespiking can be reduced from a short-term report (i.e., License Event Reportor Special Report) to an item which is included in an annual report, TS3.1.D.3 would be eliminated with the appropriate reporting requirementbeing fulfilled under TS 6.6.A.3. Because Surry does not submit an annualreport, TS 6.6.A.3 would be revised to include the iodine spiking informationin the Monthly Operating Report. In accordance with the Generic Letter, the information regarding fuel burnupby core region would also be deleted from TS 3.1.D.4. As discussed in the Generic Letter, the quality of nuclear fuel has beengreatly improved over the past decade with the result that coolant iodineactivity is normally well below the TS limit. In addition, 10 CFR 50.72(b)(1)(ii)requires the licensee to immediately notify the NRC if fuel cladding failuresexceed expected values or are caused by unexpected factors. Thus, the 300hour limit is no longer considered necessary on the basis that proper fuelmanagement and existing reporting requirements should preclude ever approachingthe limit. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationsif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee has determined and the NRC staff agrees that the proposedamendments will not: <ITAG tagnum="21">(1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequenceof an accident previously evaluated. The changes involve administrativechanges specified in Generic Letter 85-19. The deletion of the requirementto submit a Special Report if the coolant activity limit is exceeded formore than 300 hours in any 6-month period is not considered necessary becauseof the increased quality of nuclear fuel production and management, andthe requirement of 10 CFR 50.72(b)(1)(ii) for immediate notification iffuel clad failures exceed expected values should preclude approaching thelimit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously identified. The changes involve administrativechanges specified in Generic Letter 85-19. The deletion of the requirementto submit a Special Report if the coolant activity limit is exceeded formore than 300 hours in any 6-month period is not considered necessary becauseof the increased quality of nuclear fuel production and management, andthe requirement of 10 CFR 50.72(b)(1)(ii) for immediate notification iffuel clad failures exceed expected values should preclude approaching thelimit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The changesinvolve administrative changes specified in Generic Letter 85-19. The deletionof the requirement to submit a Special Report if the coolant activity limitis exceeded for more than 300 hours in any 6-month period is not considerednecessary because of the increased quality of nuclear fuel production andmanagement, and the requirement of 10 CFR 50.72(b)(1)(ii) for immediatenotification if fuel clad failures exceed expected values should precludeapproaching the limit. </ITAG>Accordingly, the staff proposes to determine that the proposed changesdo not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Swem Library, College ofWilliam and Mary, Williamsburg, Virginia 23185. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Michael W. Maupin, Esq., Hunton and Williams,Post Office Box 1535, Richmond, Virginia 23213. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Herbert N. Berkow <ITAG tagnum="84">Virginia Electric and Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-280 and 50-281,Surry Power Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Surry County, Virginia </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment requests: </T3>August 5, 1988, as supplemented bysubmittal dated January 25, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment requests: </T3>The proposed Technical Specifications(TS) changes will revise the requirements governing the operability ofthe Individual Rod Position Indicating System (IRPIS). The basic thrustof the proposed changes is to shift the emphasis from the IRPIS to thedemand position indication system (the step counters) for rod group positioninformation during shutdown and certain transient operational modes suchas reactor startup. For those conditions where confirmatory informationdemonstrating rod motion on demand is important, the IRPIS will be availableto provide this information. The supplementary submittal of January 25,1989 clarified the operability requirements of the IRPIS during a reactorstartup and power operations. Surry has experienced operational difficulties with the IRPIS due to systemnonlinearities and both transient and steady state temperature sensitivities.The licensee has stated that there are two basic deficiencies in the IRPISperformance. First, the instrumentation readout design is based on theassumption that secondary output voltage is a linear function of rod position.In fact, the steady-state calibration curve is an arc-shaped or even anS-shaped curve. This deviation from linearity is normally absorbed by a2712 step TS allowance for rod misalignment. The second drawback is that the instrument response is highly temperaturesensitive, and there is a transient (nonequilibrium) temperature responseassociated not only with Reactor Coolant System (RCS) temperature changesbut also with rod motion, leading to inaccuracies with respect to rod positionindication. This transient thermal response problem has been characterizedas an ``overshoot'' for most plants. In other words, if a rod is withdrawn,the IRPIS will show greater withdrawal than actual for a period of time,and then as the system returns to thermal equilibrium the indication willsettle back to the ``true'' calibrated value. Similarly, if the rod isinserted, the IRPIS will initially indicate a greater insertion than actual.The ``thermal soak'' time, or the time for the IRPIS to reach equilibriumfollowing rod motion, is reported to range between 20 and 45 minutes. To enhance rod position indication accuracy, the licensee has proposedthe following changes: 1. The IRPIS operability requirements during shutdown conditions will beremoved and replaced by a requirement for a 272 step demand counter accuracy.2. The incorporation of a ``soak time'' of up to 1 hour in every 24, below50% power. The TS sections that would be revised as a result of the proposed changesare: (1) TS 3.12.C.1 - Inoperable Rod Definition, (2) TS 3.12.E.1 - RodPosition Indication Requirements, (3) TS 3.12.E.2.a - IRPIS Inoperability,and (4) TS Table 4.1-1 - Surveillance Requirements. A discussion will alsobe added to the Bases section, which will address the ``Thermal Soak''allowance for nonequilibrium effects, noting its justification and limitations.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationsif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licenseehas determined and the NRC staff agrees with their determination that:<ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The proposed changes will increase neither the probability ofoccurrence of any of the UFSAR [Updated Final Safety Analysis Report] accidentsnor their potential consequences. The probability of a misaligned rod remainingundetected is exceedingly small, because of the tolerance requirement andthe historically excellent performance of the step demand counters, andbecause of the availability of the IRPIS to verify the occurrence and directionof rod movement upon demand. Further, since the proposed changes shiftrod tracking responsibility to the step demand counters when the IRPISis least reliable, rod control will be more precise and accident probabilitywill if anything be reduced. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Neither will the potential consequences of any postulated accidentincrease. Peaking factors which occur as a consequence of severely misalignedor dropped rods are verified on a reload basis as not resulting in a violationof any safety limit; the assumed misalignments easily bound any potentialmisalignment under the proposed Technical Specifications, so that thesechanges cannot result in an increase in an accident consequence. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) No new or unique accident precursors are introduced by the proposedchanges since no physical plant changes are involved. The procedural changeis a move from less precise plant control to more precise control, withoutan attendant increase in procedural complexity or a change in hardware.Thus, the possibility of an accident of a type different from those alreadyconsidered in the UFSAR is not created. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The margin of safety is not reduced. The results of the UFSARaccident analyses will continue to bound operation under the proposed changes,so that the existing safety limits remain inviolate. Specifically, thepeaking factor criteria during potential misaligned and dropped rod eventswill continue to be verified on a reload basis. As such, there is no safetymargin reduction. </ITAG>Accordingly, the staff proposes to determine that the proposed change doesnot involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Swem Library, College ofWilliam and Mary, Williamsburg, Virginia 23185. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Michael W. Maupin, Esq., Hunton and Williams,Post Office Box 1535, Richmond, Virginia 23213. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Herbert N. Berkow <ITAG tagnum="84">Wolf Creek Nuclear Operating Corporation, Docket No. 50-482, WolfCreek Generating Station, Coffey County, Kansas </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>July 6, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>This proposed amendment revisesWolf Creek Generating Station (WCGS), Unit No. 1, Technical SpecificationTables 3.3-3 and 4.3-2, which address the Engineered Safety Features ActuationSystem Instrumentation. This amendment request removes the Mode 2 applicabilityrequirements from Table 3.3-3 Functional Unit 6.g and Table 4.3-2 FunctionalUnit 6.g, ``Trip of All Main Feedwater Pumps - Start Motor Driven Pumps''.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>In accordance with the requirements of 10 CFR 50.92, the licenseehas submitted the following no significant hazards determination: 1. Does the proposed amendment involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated? <ITAG tagnum="21">Response </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. Nocredit was taken in the safety analysis for the auxiliary feedwater actuationsignal as a result of the trip of all main feedwater pumps in either MODE1 or MODE 2. The proposed change does not effect the availability of anyother protective features. </ITAG>2. Does the proposed amendment create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated? <ITAG tagnum="21">Response </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. Thisproposed amendment does not effect an auxiliary feedwater actuation onlow-low steam generator level, which assures a heat sink for the reactor.This change does not involve any design changes to existing plant systemsor the addition of any new equipment or systems. </ITAG>3. Does the proposed amendment involve a significant reduction in a marginof safety? <ITAG tagnum="21">Response </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reduction ina margin of safety. This signal is strictly an anticipatory function. Thereis no change to a margin of safety. </ITAG>Based on the previous discussion, the licensee concluded that the proposedamendment request does not involve a significant increase in the probabilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;nor involve a significant reduction in the required margin of safety. TheNRC staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationsdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. The staff has, therefore,made a proposed determination that the licensee's request does not involvea significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room Location: </T3>Emporia State University,William Allen White Library, 1200 Commercial Street, Emporia, Kansas 66801and Washburn University School of Law Library, Topeka, Kansas 66621 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Jay Silberg, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Pottsand Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Jose A. Calvo <ITAG tagnum="84">NOTICE OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATING LICENSE </ITAG>During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commissionhas issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined foreach of these amendments that the application complies with the standardsand requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act),and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commission has made appropriatefindings as required by the Act and the Commission's rules and regulationsin 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the license amendment. Notice of Consideration of Issuance of Amendment to Facility OperatingLicense and Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determinationand Opportunity for Hearing in connection with these actions was publishedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>as indicated. No request for a hearing or petitionfor leave to intervene was filed following this notice. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendmentssatisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impactstatement or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments.If the Commission has prepared an environmental assessment under the specialcircumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determinationbased on that assessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the applicationsfor amendments, (2) the amendments, and (3) the Commission's related letters,Safety Evaluations and/or Environmental Assessments as indicated. All ofthese items are available for public inspection at the Commission's PublicDocument Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC,and at the local public document rooms for the particular facilities involved.A copy of items (2) and (3) may be obtained upon request addressed to theU.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Director,Division of Reactor Projects. <ITAG tagnum="84">Boston Edison Company, Docket No. 50-293, Pilgrim Nuclear Power Station,Plymouth County, Massachusetts </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>November 19, 1985, as supplementedon December 5, 1986, February 18, 1987, July 24, 1987 and March 14, 1988.<T3>Brief Description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications by reducing the frequency and the number of control rodstested in a given cycle. This change would reduce control rod system wearand would bring the Technical Specifications for control rod testing intoreasonable conformance with the standard Technical Specifications for BoilingWater Reactors. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 1, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>February 1, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>124 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-35: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>February 26, 1986 (51 FR 6820). The requestwas renoticed on November 4, 1987 (52 FR 42358). The Commission's relatedevaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated February1, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Plymouth Public Library,11 North Street, Plymouth, Massachusetts 02360. <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-325, BrunswickSteam Electric Plant, Unit 1, Brunswick County, North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>May 27, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changed the TechnicalSpecifications to lower the reactor water level setpoints for the isolationof the Group 1 primary containment isolation valves from low level 2 tolow level 3. The amendment also added and changed instrument numbers tobe consistent with plant modifications to be made as a result of the setpointchanges. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 6, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>February 6, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>122 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-71: </T3>Amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46137). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated February 6, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3297. <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-325, BrunswickSteam Electric Plant, Unit 1, Brunswick County, North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>July 11, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications to change the operability and surveillance requirementsrelated to anticipated transient without scram (ATWS) recirculation pumptrip instrumentation. Specifically, it allows modification of the recirculationpump trip logic from one-out-of-two to two-out-of-two. In addition, itpermits replacing the existing digital pressure instrumentation with analoginstrumentation. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 6, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>February 6, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>123 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-71: </T3>Amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 30, 1988 at 53 FR 48325. The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated February 6, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3297. <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-325, BrunswickSteam Electric Plant, Unit 1, Brunswick County, North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>September 25, 1987 and August1, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changes the TechnicalSpecifications to: (1) revise the minimum critical power ratio (MCPR) safetylimit, (2) modify operating limits for average power range monitor (APRM)setpoints, MCPR values, maximum average planar linear heat generation rate(MAPLHGR) values and linear heat generation rate (LHGR) requirements) forCycle 7, (3) revise the values of mu and sigma found in Specification 3.2.3.2to conform to the advanced GEMINI/ODYN analysis methods and add a referenceto notch 36 for Specification 3.2.3.2, (4) redefine Critical Power Ratioand Physics Tests, (5) permit fuel burnup not to exceed 60,000 megawattdays per metric ton (6) change the bases statements accordingly to reflectthe above described changes. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 6, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>February 6, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>124 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-71: </T3>Amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 30, 1988 at 53FR48325. The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated February 6, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3297. <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-373 and 50-374, LaSalleCounty Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, LaSalle County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>July 12, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments revise the LaSalleCounty Station, Units 1 and 2 Technical Specifications by reducing theOnsite Nuclear Safety Group minimum staffing requirements from four engineersto three engineers. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>January 31, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>January 31, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>62, 43 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-11 and NPF-18. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications for NPF-11 and NPF-18. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>August 24, 1988 (53 FR 32292). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated January 31, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Public Library of IllinoisValley Community College, Rural Route No. 1, Oglesby, Illinois 61348. <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-373 and 50-374, LaSalleCounty Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, LaSalle County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>January 19, February 24, 1987and May 24, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments allow the continuedoperation of one unit for a period of 7 days while the common plant Division1 diesel generator O is out of service for the performance of certain TechnicalSpecification surveillance requirements. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 7, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>February 7, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>63 and 44 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-11 and NPF-18. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>June 3, 1987 (52 FR 20797). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated February 7, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Public Library of IllinoisValley Community College, Rural Route No. 1, Oglesby, Illinois 61348 <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-373 and 50-374, LaSalleCounty Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, LaSalle County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>May 23 and August 9, 1988<T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments revise the LaSalleCounty Station, Units 1 and 2 Technical Specifications by modifying thetable of primary containment isolation valves to identify new excess flowcheck valves being installed during the second refuel outage and removelicense conditions which are obsolete as a result of the modification.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 7, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>Forty-five days following date of issuance <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>64 and 45 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-11 and NPF-18. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications for NPF-11 and NPF-18 and deletedLicense Conditions in NPF-11 and NPF-18. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>August 24, 1988 (53 FR 32291) and September7, 1988 (53 FR 34601). The Commission's related evaluation of the amendmentsis contained in a Safety Evaluation dated February 7, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Public Library of IllinoisValley Community College, Rural Route No. 1, Oglesby, Illinois 61348. <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket No. 50-254, Quad Cities NuclearPower Station, Unit 1, Rock Island County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>May 10, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>Appendices A and B of DPR-29 wereretyped in their entirety to improve legibility and remove typographicaland grammatical errors. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 7, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>February 7, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>114 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-29. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications and Environmental Protection Plan (Non-Radiological). <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>June 15, 1988 (53 FR 22399). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated February 7, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Dixon Public Library, 221Hennepin Avenue, Dixon, Illinois 61021. <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket No. 50-265, Quad Cities NuclearPower Station, Unit 2, Rock Island County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>July 7, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>To revise drywell pressure indicatorpanel location and correct miscellaneous typographical errors on relatedpages. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 6, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>February 6, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>110 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-30. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46140). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated February 6, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Dixon Public Library, 221Hennepin Avenue, Dixon, Illinois 61021. <ITAG tagnum="84">Consolidated Edison Company of New York, Docket No. 50-247, IndianPoint Nuclear Generating Unit No. 2, Westchester County, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>August 29, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications to correct Table 3.13-2 (1 of 2) concerning the elevationof the Hose station at the Southeast end of the fuel storage building.The Table currently states the Hose Station is at elevation 104. It shouldread elevation 140. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 6, l989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>February 6, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>136 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-26: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>December 14, 1988 (53 FR 50324). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated February 6, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>White Plains Public Library,100 Martine Avenue, White Plains, New York 10610. <ITAG tagnum="84">Florida Power and Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-389, St. LuciePlant, Unit No. 2, St. Lucie County, Florida </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment requests: </T3>August 27, 1985, supplemented May7, 1986 and superseded October 19, 1987, and application dated December12, 1986. <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>This amendment changed the dieselgenerator Technical Specifications to reflect the recommendations containedin Generic Letter 84-15 ``Proposed Staff Actions to Improve and MaintainDiesel Generator Reliability.'' These changes were requested by letterdated October 19, 1987. The amendment also deleted existing diesel generatorfuel oil sampling requirements and replaced them with more effective samplingrequirements, requested by letter dated December 12, 1986. <T3>Date of Issuance: </T3>February 7, 1989 <T3>Effective Date: </T3>February 7, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>39 <T3>Facility Operation License No. NPF-16: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notices in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>October 9, 1985 (50 FR 41247), December 2, 1987(952 FR 45886), and January 14, 1987 (52 FR 1549). The Commission's relatedevaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated February7, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Indian River Junior CollegeLibrary, 3209 Virginia Avenue, Ft. Pierce, Florida. <ITAG tagnum="84">Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal ElectricAuthority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket No. 50-424, VogtleElectric Generating Plant, Unit 1, Burke County, Georgia </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>December 6, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment modified the TechnicalSpecifications (TS) to reflect the control room configuration for two-unitoperation. These changes were necessitated by differences between the currentUnit 1 limiting conditions for operation, action statements, and surveillancerequirements, and those proposed for the combined Unit 1 and Unit 2 TS.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 9, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>February 9, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>17 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-68: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>December 16, 1988 (53 FR 50607). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated February 9, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Burke County Library, 412Fourth Street, Waynesboro, Georgia 30830 <ITAG tagnum="84">Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal ElectricAuthority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket No. 50-424, VogtleElectric Generating Plant, Unit 1, Burke County, Georgia </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>December 12, 1988, as supplementedJanuary 13, 30, and 31, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment replaced the Unit1 Techncial Specifications (TS) with combined TS for Units 1 and 2. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 9, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>February 9, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>18 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-68: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>December 27, 1988 (53 FR 52266). Because theJanuary 13, 30, and 31, 1989, submittals contained minor editorial changesthe substance of the changes noticed in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and the proposed no significant hazards determinationwere not affected. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in aSafety Evaluation dated February 9, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Burke County Library, 412Fourth Street, Waynesboro, Georgia 30830 <ITAG tagnum="84">Gulf States Utilities Company, Docket No. 50-458, River Bend Station,Unit 1 West Feliciana Parish, Louisiana </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>November 18, 1988, as supplementedDecember 20, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment provided the bundleMaximum Average Planar Linear Heat Generation Rate (MAPLHGR) and the higherLinear Hear Generation Rate (LHGR) limits for the new fuel being addedfor the second reload. The new fuel being added is GE8X8EB which is similarto other bundles currently in the River Bend core and has an increasedLHGR limit of 14.4 kW/ft. The amendment revised Specification 3/4.2.1 toinclude new figures and Specification 3.2.4 to include the high LHGR limit.The amendment also revised three additional areas of the Technical Specifications(TS). Technical Specification Section 5, Design Features, Item 5.3.1 wasrevised to generalize the fuel details to allow referencing future fueldesigns included in the ``General Electric Standard Application for ReactorFuels'' (GESTAR). Technical Specification Bases 3/4.2.1 was revised toreference Technical Specification 3.2.1 instead of referencing individualMAPLHGR curves. Figure 3.2.1 was also revised to show the current flowdependent Minimum Critical Power Ratio (MCPR) operating limit curve. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>January 30, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>January 30, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>33 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-47. </T3>The amendment revised theTechnical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>December 14, 1988 (53 FR 50326). The December16 and 20, 1988 submittals provided plant-specific and additional clarifyinginformation and did not change the finding of the initial notice or thescope of the amendment request. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in aSafety Evaluation dated January 30, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Government Documents Department,Louisiana State University, Baton Rouge, Louisiana 70803 <ITAG tagnum="84">Louisiana Power and Light Company, Docket No. 50-382, Waterford SteamElectric Station, Unit 3, St. Charles Parish, Louisiana </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>September 21, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications by deleting the Ammonia Detection System. Ammonia detectionwill be provided by the Broad Range Toxic Gas Detection System which iscurrently in the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 6, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>February 6, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>49 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-38. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46148). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated February 6, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of New OrleansLibrary, Louisiana Collection, Lakefront, New Orleans, Louisiana 70122.<ITAG tagnum="84">Louisiana Power and Light Company, Docket No. 50-382, Waterford SteamElectric Station, Unit 3, St. Charles Parish, Louisiana </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>September 20, 1988 and November 28,1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications and License Condition 2.C.9 by removing certain fire protectionrequirements in response to Generic Letters 86-10 and 88-12. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 7, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>February 7, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>50 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-38. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications and license. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>December 30, 1988 (53 FR 53094). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated February 7, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of New OrleansLibrary, Louisiana Collection, Lakefront, New Orleans, Louisiana 70122.<ITAG tagnum="84">Nebraska Public Power District, Docket No. 50-298, Cooper NuclearStation, Nemaha County, Nebraska </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>June 10, 1987 as modified March 4,1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changed the TechnicalSpecifications relating to the fire protection program. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 3, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>February 3, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>127 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-46. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 4, 1987 (52 FR 42366). The March 4,1988 submittal provided additional clarifying information and did not changethe finding of the initial notice. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in aSafety Evaluation dated February 3, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Auburn Public Library, 11815th Street, Auburn, Nebraska 68305. <ITAG tagnum="84">Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket No. 50-352, Limerick GeneratingStation, Unit 1, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>November 5, 1986 as supplementedNovember 5, 1987 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications relating to the trip setpoints and allowable values forthe low pressure coolant injection valve differential pressure instrumentloops. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 9, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>30 days after date of issuance <T3>Amendment No. </T3>16 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-39. </T3>This amendment revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 30, 1988 (53 FR 48335). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated February 9, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pottstown Public Library,500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. <ITAG tagnum="84">Public Service Electric andamp; Gas Company, Docket No. 50-354, HopeCreek Generating Station, Salem County, New Jersey </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>July 12, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment removed the organizationcharts from Section 6.0 of the TS and replaced them with a narrative descriptionof offsite and onsite organizations functional requirements per guidanceprovided by NRC Generic Letter 88-06. It also made a couple of other minoradministrative changes to Section 6.0. On December 5, 1988 the licenseeclarified position titles for this amendment. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>January 31, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>January 31, 1989 <T3>Amendment No. </T3>21 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-57. </T3>This amendment revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>August 24, 1988 (53 FR 32294). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated January 31, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pennsville Public Library,190 S. Broadway, Pennsville, New Jersey 08070 <ITAG tagnum="84">Southern California Edison Company, et al., Docket No. 50-206, SanOnofre Nuclear Generating Station, Unit No. 1, San Diego County, California</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>October 30, 1987 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment provides limitingconditions for operation and surveillance requirements for reactor coolantsystem leakage detection systems. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>February 6, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>This license amendment is effective the date ofissuance and must be fully implemented no later than 30 days from dateof issuance. <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>119 <T3>Provisional Operating License No. DPR-13. </T3>Amendment revised theTechnical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>July 13, 1988 (53 FR 26531). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated February 6, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No comments.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>General Library, Universityof California, Post Office Box 19557, Irvine, California 92713. <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>April 17, 1987 (TS 87-09)<T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments revise the SequoyahUnits 1 and 2 Technical Specifications to add the diesel generator system(DGS) electrical board rooms in the Diesel Generator Building to the limitingcondition for operation 3.7.11.3 for the low-pressure carbon dioxide system.These additions to the TS add the requirement that this carbon dioxidesystem must also be operable for the DGS electrical board rooms for bothunits. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>January 22, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>January 22, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>96, 85 <T3>Facility Operating Licenses Nos. DPR-77 and DPR-79. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>August 12, 1987 (52 FR 29930). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated January 22, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Chattanooga-Hamilton CountyLibrary, 1001 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402. <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>February 1, 1988 (TS 87-45)and August 10, 1988 (TS 88-08) <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments revise the Sequoyah,Units 1 and 2 Technical Specifications (TS). The changes are to reviseTable 3.3-11, ``Fire Protection Instruments,'' to correct typographicalerrors and omissions and to add or remove instrumentation to reflect plantmodifications. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>January 22, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>January 22, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>97, 86 <T3>Facility Operating Licenses Nos. DPR-77 and DPR-79. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 20, 1988 (53 FR 13023) for TS 87-45 andSeptember 7, 1988 (53 FR 34613) for TS 88-08. The Commission's relatedevaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January22, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Chattanooga-Hamilton CountyLibrary, 1001 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402. <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>July 27, 1988 as supplementedby letter dated October 20, 1988. (TS 88-13) <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments modify the SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2 Technical Specifications. The changes areto revise the containment systems surveillance requirement 4.6.5.1.b.3for both units. These changes will replace the visual inspection requirementutilizing a 0.38-inch criterion for the ice condenser system with a surveillanceprogram to ensure that the flow blockage does not excced 15 percent. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>January 30, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>January 30, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>98, 87 <T3>Facility Operating Licenses Nos. DPR-77 and DPR-79. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>August 24, 1988 (53 FR 32293). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated January 30, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Chattanooga-Hamilton CountyLibrary, 1001 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402. <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>June 13, 1988 (TS 88-04) <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendments revise the SequoyahUnits 1 and 2 Technical Specifications (TS). The revisions are to the ActionStatements a, b and c for the Limiting Condition for Operation (LCO) 3.8.1.1to extend the timeframe for performing diesel generator surveillance inSurveillance Requirement (SR) 4.8.1.1.2.a.4 when the LCO is not met. LCO 3.8.1.1 requires a minimum of two alternating current (ac) electricaloffsite power sources and four onsite ac power sources (diesel generatorsets) to be operable. In the event ac power sources are lost, compliancewith one of four Actions Statements is required depending on the numberof sources lost. The amendments extend the timeframe for performing theSR 4.8.1.1.2.a.4 for the following three cases. For the first case, whereeither an offsite circuit or a diesel generator set is inoperable (Actiona), performance of SR 4.8.1.1.2.a.4 is extended to 24 hours. For the secondcase, where one offsite circuit and one diesel generator set are inoperable(Action b), performance of SR 4.8.1.1.2.a.4 is extended to eight hours.For the third case, where two offsite circuits are inoperable (Action c),performance of SR 4.8.1.1.2.a.4 is extended to eight hours. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>January 31, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>January 31, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>100, 89 <T3>Facility Operating Licenses Nos. DPR-77 and DPR-79. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>June 29, 1988 (53 FR 24521). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated January 31, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Chattanooga-Hamilton CountyLibrary, 1001 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402. <ITAG tagnum="84">NOTICE OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATING LICENSE ANDFINAL DETERMINATION OF NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATION AND OPPORTUNITYFOR HEARING (EXIGENT OR EMERGENCY CIRCUMSTANCES) </ITAG>During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commissionhas issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined foreach of these amendments that the application for the amendment complieswith the standards and requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, asamended (the Act), and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commissionhas made appropriate findings as required by the Act and the Commission'srules and regulations in 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the licenseamendment. Because of exigent or emergency circumstances associated with the datethe amendment was needed, there was not time for the Commission to publish,for public comment before issuance, its usual 30-day Notice of Considerationof Issuance of Amendment and Proposed No Significant Hazards ConsiderationDetermination and Opportunity for a Hearing. For exigent circumstances,the Commission has either issued a <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice providing opportunity for public commentor has used local media to provide notice to the public in the area surroundinga licensee's facility of the licensee's application and of the Commission'sproposed determination of no significant hazards consideration. The Commissionhas provided a reasonable opportunity for the public to comment, usingits best efforts to make available to the public means of communicationfor the public to respond quickly, and in the case of telephone comments,the comments have been recorded or transcribed as appropriate and the licenseehas been informed of the public comments. In circumstances where failure to act in a timely way would have resulted,for example, in derating or shutdown of a nuclear power plant or in preventionof either resumption of operation or of increase in power output up tothe plant's licensed power level, the Commission may not have had an opportunityto provide for public comment on its no significant hazards determination.In such case, the license amendment has been issued without opportunityfor comment. If there has been some time for public comment but less than30 days, the Commission may provide an opportunity for public comment.If comments have been requested, it is so stated. In either event, theState has been consulted by telephone whenever possible. Under its regulations, the Commission may issue and make an amendment immediatelyeffective, notwithstanding the pendency before it of a request for a hearingfrom any person, in advance of the holding and completion of any requiredhearing, where it has determined that no significant hazards considerationis involved. The Commission has applied the standards of 10 CFR 50.92 and has made afinal determination that the amendment involves no significant hazardsconsideration. The basis for this determination is contained in the documentsrelated to this action. Accordingly, the amendments have been issued andmade effective as indicated. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendmentssatisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impactstatement or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments.If the Commission has prepared an environmental assessment under the specialcircumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determinationbased on that assessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the applicationfor amendment, (2) the amendment to Facility Operating License, and (3)the Commission's related letter, Safety Evaluation and/or EnvironmentalAssessment, as indicated. All of these items are available for public inspectionat the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street,NW., Washington, DC, and at the local public document room for the particularfacility involved. A copy of items (2) and (3) may be obtained upon request addressed to theU.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Director,Division of Reactor Projects. The Commission is also offering an opportunity for a hearing with respectto the issuance of the amendments. By March 24, 1989, the licensee mayfile a request for a hearing with respect to issuance of the amendmentto the subject facility operating license and any person whose interestmay be affected by this proceeding and who wishes to participate as a partyin the proceeding must file a written petition for leave to intervene.Requests for a hearing and petitions for leave to intervene shall be filedin accordance with the Commission's ``Rules of Practice for Domestic LicensingProceedings'' in 10 CFR Part 2. If a request for a hearing or petitionfor leave to intervene is filed by the above date, the Commission or anAtomic Safety and Licensing Board, designated by the Commission or by theChairman of the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board Panel, will rule on therequest and/or petition and the Secretary or the designated Atomic Safetyand Licensing Board will issue a notice of hearing or an appropriate order.As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall setforth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceedingand how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding.The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention shouldbe permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) thenature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to theproceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial,or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of anyorder which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest.The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subjectmatter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Anyperson who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has beenadmitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave ofthe Board up to fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfythe specificity requirements described above. Not later than fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to thepetition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions whichare sought to be litigated in the matter, and the bases for each contentionset forth with reasonable specificity. Contentions shall be limited tomatters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. A petitionerwho fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirementswith respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participateas a party. Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subjectto any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have theopportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, includingthe opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. Since the Commission has made a final determination that the amendmentinvolves no significant hazards consideration, if a hearing is requested,it will not stay the effectiveness of the amendment. Any hearing held wouldtake place while the amendment is in effect. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filedwith the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Service Branch, or may bedelivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building,2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC, by the above date. Where petitionsare filed during the last ten (10) days of the notice period, it is requestedthat the petitioner promptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephonecall to Western Union at 1-(800) 325-6000 (in Missouri 1-(800) 342-6700).The Western Union operator should be given Datagram Identification Number3737 and the following message addressed to (<T3>Project Director</T3>): petitioner's name and telephone number; datepetition was mailed; plant name; and publication date and page number ofthis <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. A copy of the petition should also besent to the Office of the General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee. Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions,supplemental petitions and/or requests for hearing will not be entertainedabsent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or theAtomic Safety and Licensing Board, that the petition and/or request shouldbe granted based upon a balancing of the factors specified in 10 CFR 2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v)and 2.714(d). <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>January 27, 1989 (TS 89-17)<T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendments revise the Sequoyah,Units 1 and 2 Technical Specifications. The revisions modify the acceptancecriteria for the diesel generator surveillance requirements 4.8.1.1.2.d.2and 4.8.1.1.2.d.3. The acceptance criteria have been changed from voltageto a percentage of the initial pretest voltage to reflect that the initialpretest voltage may vary from 6900 volts. In addition, a new upper limiton transient voltage has been added. A waiver of compliance was authorizedby telephone on January 25, 1989 and confirmed by letter dated January26, 1989. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>January 30, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>January 30, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>99, 88 <T3>Facility Operating Licenses Nos. DPR-77 and DPR-79. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Public comments requested as to proposed no significant hazards consideration:</T3>No The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in aSafety Evaluation dated January 30, 1989. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority,400 West Summit Hill Drive, E11 B33, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Chattanooga-Hamilton CountyLibrary, 1001 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402. <ITAG tagnum="21">Dated at Rockville, Maryland, this 14th day of February, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the Nuclear Regulatory Commission </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Martin J. Virgilio, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Director, Division of Reactor Projects - III, IV, V and SpecialProjects Office of Nuclear Reactor Regulation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[Doc. 89-3932 Filed 2-21-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 7590-01-D</ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>